DERIEKEIAVES 

FAWVIRIOIMES
Main Dishes
Chicken fried steak

Mac and cheese Chicken parm Cheeseburgers Tomato soup Cheese steak Coconut shrimp
Tacos

Quesadilla Ravioli
Meatballs

Pesto pasta Alfredo bake Pierogis
Fried calamari Chicken nuggets Fajitas
Biscuits and gravy Eggs Benedict Lemon arugula chicken Shrimp piccata Veal saltimbocca Fried rice Lasagna
Chicken curry Stuffed peppers Salmon
SwordfishBread bowls
Meatloaf

Cheeseburger pizza Sweet and sour chicken Bang bang shrimp Ricotta pasta
Fish tacos
Baked potato pizza

A5T
Y\

Egg drop souj Appetizers Guacamole
Arancini

Hummus
Taco dip Cheeseburger bread Poutine
Eggrolls
Crab cakes
Twice baked potatoes

Side

Onion rings
Waffle fries

Broccoli potato puffs Baked potato
Broccoli casserole

Desserts
Salted caramel cookies

Almond cookies Everything but the kitchen sink cookies
Lemon drop cookie

Main DishesPierogi Recipe Prep Time: 1 hour 30 minutes Cook Time: 30 minutes Total Time: 2 hours
Pierogi filled with cheesy potatoes, tossed with crisp bacon and melted butter and served with sour cream is the ultimate comfort food.
Author: Natasha of NatashasKitchen.com Skill Level: Medium
Cost to Make: $10
Keyword: Pierogi, Pierogi Recipe
Cuisine: Russian, Ukrainian
Course: Main Course
Calories: 246 kcal
Servings: 12 servings (5 pierogi per serving)
Ingredients Ingredients for Potato Filing:
2 Ibs russet potatoes (5 medium), peeled 1/2 tsp salt
2 Thsp butter melted
2 oz cream cheese softened
3/4 cup mozzarella cheese shredded
For the Pierogi Dough:
1 cup warm water
1/4 cup whole milk
2 Thsp sour cream
1 large egg
1 tsp salt (plus more for cooking)
4 cups all-purpose flour measured correctly*
For the Toppings (For 1/3 batch):
4 0z bacon chopped 2 Thsp butter Sour Cream to serve

Instructions How to Make Potato Cheese Filling:
1. Place potatoes in a pot, add enough water to cover potatoes then bring to a boil over medium/high and continue cooking 25 minutes or until easily pierced with a fork. Drain and cool 5 minutes then mash potatoes.
2. Mash in 1/2 tsp salt, 2 Tbhsp melted butter and 2 0z cream cheese. Mash in 3/4 cup shredded mozzarella cheese. Partially cover and set aside while rolling out the dough.
To Make Pierogi Dough:
1. In the bowl of a stand mixer (or large mixing bowl if mixing by hand), whisk together 1 cup warm water, 1/4 cup milk, 2 Thsp sour cream, 1 egg and 1 tsp salt until blended.
2. Using dough hook attachment, add 2 cups flour and mix on speed 2 until incorporated. Add remaining flour 1/2 cup at a time, letting it incorporate before adding more. Add the last bit of flour 1 Tbsp at a time just until dough no longer sticks to sides of the bowl. Knead on speed 2 or by hand for 10 minutes.
How to Mold Pierogi:
1. Divide dough into 2 pieces. Cover the second piece with the mixing bowl and thinly roll the first piece out onto a floured surface to just under 1/8" thickness.
2. Use a 3" diameter round cookie cutter to cut circles from the dough, keeping them as close as possible (collect scraps and place under the bowl to re-use). Add 1/2 Tbsp of potatoes over each round.
3. To form pierogi, pull the 2 edges together and pinch tightly to seal. To ensure a tight seal, crimp the edges a second time with a pinch and twist motion. Cook or freeze pierogi for a future dinner (see freezing instructions in post).
How to Make Bacon Topping:
1. Make the topping before boiling pierogi so it's ready to drizzle over pierogi to prevent sticking. In a medium skillet, saute 4 oz chopped bacon. Once crisp, melt in 2 Thsp butter and remove from heat.
How to Cook Pierogi:
1. Bring a pot of water to a rolling boil and add 1 Thsp salt. Add fresh or frozen pierogi. Once they are floating and water is back to a boil, cook additional 3-5 minutes or until dough is very tender. Remove to a bowl with a slotted spoon drizzling buttery bacon between layers.
Recipe Notes
This recipe makes 55-60 pierogi, based on how thinly you roll.
Serving suggestion: serve with caramelized onion and cut up sausage

$1.20/12 servingsFish Tacos Recipe with Best Fish Taco Sauce! Prep Time: 30 minutes Cook Time: 25 minutes  Total Time: 55 minutes
Our all-time favorite fish tacos recipe! These are loaded with fresh ingredients and perfectly seasoned plump fish. Don't skip the best fish taco sauce - an irresistible garlic lime crema.
Author: Natasha of NatashasKitchen.com Skill Level: Easy
Cost to Make: $20-$256
Keyword: fish tacos
Cuisine: American
Course: Dinner, Lunch, Main Course Calories: 172 kcal
Servings: 24 tacos

Ingredients
Fish Taco Ingredients:
24 small white corn tortillas 11/2 Ib tilapia
1/2 tsp ground cumin
1/2 tsp cayenne pepper 1tsp salt
1/4 tsp black pepper
1 Thsp Olive oil
1 Thsp Butter
Fish Taco Toppings:
1/2 small purple cabbage
2 medium avocado sliced
2 roma tomatoes diced {optional)
1/2 diced red onion
1/2 bunch Cilantro longer stems removed 4 oz 1 cup Cotija cheese, grated
1 lime cut into 8 wedges to serve
Fish Taco Sauce Ingredients:
1/2 cup sour cream
1/3 cup Mayo
2 Thsp lime juice from 1 medium lime 1tsp garlic powder
1tsp Sriracha sauce or to taste
Instructions
1. Line large baking sheet with parchment or silicone liner. In a small dish, combine seasonings: 1/2 tsp cumin, 1/2 tsp cayenne pepper, 1tsp salt and 1/4 tsp black pepper and evenly sprinkle seasoning mix over both sides of tilapia.
2. Lightly drizzle fish with olive oil and dot each piece with butter. Bake at 375 for 20-25 min. To brown edges, broil for 3-5 minutes at the end if desired.
3. Combine all Taco sauce ingredients in a medium bowl and whisk until well blended. 4. To serve the tacos, toast quickly toast the corn tortillas on a large dry skillet or griddle over medium/high heat.
5. To assemble: start with pieces of fish then add remaining ingredients finishing with a generous sprinkle of cotija cheese and finally that awesome taco sauce! Serve with a fresh lime wedge to squeeze over tacos.

Serving suggestion: have as is$1.20/24 tacos
allrecipes
Italian Bread Bowls kR WY
These cute little bread bowls are a great way to serve soup in the wintertime. | usually serve a hearty potato soup when | have the time to bake them. They freeze for up to 1 month, if desired.

Prep: 30 mins
Cook: 30 mins Additional: 1 hr 15 mins Total: 2 hrs 15 mins Servings: 8
Yield: 8 bowls

Ingredients
2 (.25 ounce) packages active dry yeast
22 cups warm water (110 degrees F/45 degrees C)
2 teaspoons salt
2 tablespoons vegetable oil
7 cups all-purpose flour 1 tablespoon cornmeal 1 egg white
1 tablespoon water

Serving suggestion: serve with pasta
51.25/8 servings

Directions Step 1 In a large bowl, dissolve yeast in warm water. Let stand until creamy, about 10 minutes.
Step 2 Add salt, oil and 4 cups flour to the yeast mixture; beat well. Stir in the remaining flour, 1/2 cup at a time, beating well with an electric mixer at medium speed after each addition.
Step 3
When the dough has pulled together, turn it out onto a lightly floured surface and knead until smooth and elastic, about 6 minutes. Lightly oil a large bowl, place the dough in the bowl and turn to coat with oil. Cover with a damp cloth and let rise in a warm place until doubled in volume, about 40 minutes.
Step 4
Punch dough down, and divide into 8 equal portions. Shape each portion into a 4 inch round loaf. Place loaves on lightly greased baking sheets sprinkled with cornmeal. Cover and let rise in a warm place, free from drafts, until doubled in bulk, about 35 minutes.
Step 5 Preheat oven to 400 degrees F (200 degrees C). In a small bowl, beat together egg white and 1 tablespoon water; lightly brush the loaves with half of this egg wash.
Step 6 Bake in preheated oven for 15 minutes. Brush with remaining egg mixture, and bake 10 to 15 more minutes or until golden. Cool on wire racks.
Step 7 To make bowls: Cut a 1/2 inch thick slice from top of each loaf; scoop out centers, leaving 3/4inch-thick shells. Fill bread bowls with hot soup and serve immediately.
Nutrition Facts Per Serving: 439 calories; protein 12.5g; carbohydrates 85g; fat 4.6g; sodium 593.7mg.
© Copyright 2021 allrecipes.com. All rights reserved. Printed from it ps: / /vy . —Pagta e Fagioli

Ingredients:
[ lb Ground Beef (or Turkey)
| Qmall Onion, diced (I cup)
[ Large Carrot, julienned (! cup)
3 Stalke of Celery, chopped (| cup)
3 Cloves Rarlic, minced
2 - 14.5 oz cane Diced Tomatoes (Italian Seaconed)
| can Dark Red Kidney Beang (I5 oz)
| can Great Northern or Cannellii Beang (15 oz)
2 cang Tomato Sauce or Puree
| Tablegpoon Worcesterchire Sauce
-/2 Teagpoon Salt
| Teagpoon Oregano
| Teagpoon Bagil
/2. Teagpoon Ground Pepper
/2. Teagpoon Tyme
Hot Sauce (to taste)
Cayenne Pepper (o facte)
[/2.1b Ditali Pagta Directions:
Brown the ground beef in a large caucepan or pot over medium heat. Drain off mogt of the fat. Add onion, carrot, celery and garlie. Saute for (O minutes. Add remaining ingrediente, except pasta and simmer for [ hour.
About 50 minutes into eimmer time, cook pagta in bailing water over high heat. Cook for [0 minutes or just until pasta ig al dente. Drain. Add pasta to soup. Simmer for 5-10 minutes. Serve and top with grated Parmegan.

serving suggestion: have as is
51.25/8 servings

Baked Potato Pizza
W - oy

Pre

Total 30 m

Take all of your favorite flavers from a loaded baked potato, and combine them on a pizza crust. Brilliant!
By Pilisbury Kitchens


Ingredients
il
@ NN NO
1/4
can (11 oz) Pillsbury™ refrigerated thin pizza crust
slices (1 oz each) provolone cheese
cups cubed unpeeled baked potato (about 1 large)
tablespoons olive oil
tablespoons ranch dressing and seasoning mix (from 1-oz milk recipe package) strips crisply cooked bacon, chopped
cup shredded mild Cheddar cheese (4 oz)
cup sliced green onions (4 medium), if desired
Sour cream, if desired

Steps
1 Heat oven to 400°F. Spray or grease 15x10-inch or larger dark or nonstick cookie sheet. Unroll dough on cookie sheet: starting at center, press dough inte 15x10-inch rectangle.
2 Arrange provolone cheese slices on dough. In medium bowl, mix potato, olive oil and ranch dressing mix. Spoon evenly over cheese. Sprinkle with bacon and Cheddar cheese.
3 Bake 13 o 16 minutes or until crust is golden brown and cheese is melted. Sprinkle with onions. Serve with sour cream.

Serving suggestion: have as is
$1.25/8 servings

Ingredie
9

Meatloaf Recipe with the Best Glaze Prep Time: 10 minutes Cook Time: 1 hour Total Time: 1 hour
Amazing homemade Meatloaf Recipe. The meatloaf is so tender and juicy on the inside with a sweet and tangy sauce that glazes the meatloaf and adds so much flavor!
Author: Valentina Ablaev
Skill Level: Easy
Cost to Make: $10-$12
Keyword: meatloaf, meatloaf recipe Cuisine: American
Course: Dinner, Main Course Calories: 344 kcal
Servings: 8 servings

Ingredients Meatloaf Ingredients:
2 Ibs ground beef 85% or 90% lean 1 med onion finely chopped
2 large eggs
3 garlic cloves minced
3 Thsp ketchup
3 Thsp fresh parsley finely chopped 3/4 cup Panko breadcrumbs
143 cup milk
1%2 tsp salt or to taste
1 V. tsp Italian seasoning
Ya tsp ground black pepper
Y2 tsp ground paprika
Meatloaf Sauce Ingredients:
3/4 cup ketchup
1% tsp white vinegar
2 V2 Tbsp brown sugar 1tsp garlic powder
s tsp onion powder
¥ tsp ground black pepper Ya tsp salt
Instructions 1. Line a 9"x5" loaf pan with parchment paper and preheat oven to 375°F. . In a large bowl, add all of the ingredients for the meatloaf. Mix well to combine.
. Add meat to the loaf pan, gently press meat down and shape evenly and bake meatloaf at 375°F for 40 minutes.
Bow oM
. In a small bowl, mix all of the ingredients together for the sauce. Spread the sauce over meatloaf then return to oven and bake additional 15-20 minutes. Rest meatloaf 10 minutes before slicing. Drizzle with baking juices from the pan.

Serving suggestion: serve with mashed potatoes and veggies
51.45/8 servingsLasagna Recipe (VIDEO)
Prep Time: 30 minutes Cook Time: 50 minutes  Resting Time: 30 minutes Total Time: 1 hour 20 minutes
This 3 cheese EASY Lasagna recipe is beefy, saucy and supremely flavorful. This homemade lasagna is better than any restaurant version and it feeds a crowd!
Author: Natasha of NatashasKitchen.com Skill Level: Easy/Medium
Cost to Make: $18-522
Keyword: lasagna, lasagna recipe Cuisine: Italian
Course: Dinner, Main Course
Calories: 368 kcal
Servings: 12 slices

Ingredients Ingredients for Lasagna
11b ground beef (15-20% fat content) 1 small onion finely diced
2 large garlic cloves minced
1/4 cup red wine (any kind), or beef broth 1 Thsp olive oil
24 oz Marinara Sauce (3 cups)
1/2 tsp sea salt
1/4 tsp black pepper ground
1/4 tsp dried thyme
1/2 tsp granulated sugar
2 Thsp parsley finely chopped
9 lasagna noodles cooked al dente
Ingredients for Cheese Sauce:
16 oz low-fat cottage cheese
15 oz reduced fat ricotta cheese
1large egg
2 Thsp parsley finely chopped, plus more to garnish 4 cups mozzarella cheese shredded, divided
Instructions How to Make Meat Sauce:
1. Place a deep pan or dutch oven over medium/high heat and add 1 Tbhsp olive oil, 11b ground beef and diced onion. Saute, breaking up the meat, for 5 minutes or until beef is no longer pink. Add pressed garlic and saute another minute until fragrant.
2. Add 1/4 cup wine and stir for 2 minutes or until wine is nearly evaporated. Add 3 cups marinara, 1/2 tsp salt, 1/4 tsp pepper, 144 tsp thyme, 1/2 tsp sugar and 2 Thsp parsley. Bring to a simmer then cover and cook 5 minutes.
How to Make Cheese Sauce: 1. In a large mixing bowl, combine 16 oz Cottage Cheese, 15 oz Ricotta, 1 cup mozzarella, 1 egg and 2 Thsp parsley. Mix well. How to Make Lasagna:
1. Preheat oven to 375°F. Bring a large pot of water to a boil. Add salt and 9 lasagna noodles. Cook until al dente according to package instructions.
2. Spread 1/2 cup meat sauce in the bottom of a deep 9x13 casserole dish. Add 3 noodles, spread on 1/3 of the meat sauce and sprinkle with 1 cup mozarella cheese. Spoon on and spread the top with 1/2 of your cheese sauce.
3. Repeat until you have 3 layers of noodles: Add 3 noodles, 1/3 meat sauce, 1 cup mozarella cheese, 1/2 cheese sauce Add 3 noodles, remaining 1/3 meat sauce, remaining 1 cup mozarella.
4. Poke 9-12 toothpicks over the surface of your lasagna (to keep the foil from sticking to the cheese). Cover with foil and bake at 375°F for 45 minutes.
5. Remove foil and broil for 3 to 5 minutes, or until cheese turns golden. Let lasagna rest 30 min before slicing.Serving suggestion: have as is
$1.50/12 servingsRicotta Pasta
The most delicious Ricotta Pasta Recipe made 2 ways, with fresh and zingy lemon zest or lots of parmesan and cracked black pepper. This no-cook pasta sauce is easy and effortless the hardest part is boiling the pasta!l


Cook Time Total Time
10 mins 10 mins ok
5 from 2 votes Course: pasta Cuisine: ltalian  Servings: 4 servings Calories: 534kecal  Author: Emily Kemp
Ingredients
Cheese and pepper version & 15 oz short pasta (4 cups [ 400g) & 1 cup full fat ricotta (250g) e % cup freshly grated parmesan e 1 cup reserved pasta water (120ml) e Salt and pepper to season
To make lemon ricotta pasta * 15 oz short pasta (4 cups [ 400g) e 1 cup ricotta (250g) Zest of 1 lemon Y cup reserved pasta water (120ml) Salt and pepper to season
Instructions
Ricotta cheese and pepper version 1. Bring a large pot of salted water to a boil and cook your desired pasta shape until al dente making sure to reserve ¥z cup of pasta water.
2. Pass the ricotta through a sieve and add to a mixing bowl with parmesan, salt and a generous amount of cracked black pepper.
3. Drain the pasta once cooked then add it back to the pot. Add the ricotta mixture and stir until completely coated.
4. Add a splash of pasta water and stir again to loosen, the pasta sauce should be smooth and creamy, serve.
Lemon ricotta version 1. Follow the same instructions as above but replace the parmeasn with lemon zest and instead of a generous amount of black pepper just sprinkle in a small amount.
2. Drain the pasta once cooked then add it back to the pot. Add the ricotta mixture and stir until completely coated.
3. Add a splash of pasta water and stir again to loosen, the pasta sauce should be smooth and creamy, serve.
Notes
e Drain any excess liquid from the ricotta befare starting (! do this by letting the ricotta sit in a sieve for a couple of minutes letting any excess liquid drain off).
e You can use any pasta shape you like for this pasta sauce but | find a shorter pasta shape works best!
® |i's always a good idea to reserve more pasta water than you'll probably need (just in case). | reserve ¥z cup but you may not need all of it depending on the consistency of the ricotta.
e This pasta sauce is best served immediately as it'll thicken and lose it's creamy texture as it coals.
& This recipe won't freeze well but it's so quick and easy to make you don't need to.Serving suggestion: have as is
52.25/ 4 servingsThis recipe allows you to have the crispy, delicious chicken nuggets you love from Chick-fil-A without even leaving your house! These Copycat Chick Fil A Nuggets taste just like the real thing. Best of all, they're ready in less than 30 minutes!
***** 4.83 from 28 votes

PREP TIME 20 mins

COURSE Main Course

SERVINGS 20 nuggets

INGREDIENTS
2 boneless skinless chicken breasts 1/2 cup milk
1eggs
1 cup flour
3 tbsp powdered sugar
2 tsp salt
1/2 tsp pepper
vegetable oil
INSTRUCTIONS
1.
Begin by cutting up your chicken breasts into bite-sized pieces. M
Place oil in a medium pan and turn to medium heat.
From there add your milk and egg to a bowl and whisk together until combined. Set aside.
Pour your flour, powdered sugar, salt and pepper into a gallon bag.
Add several chicken pieces to your milk/egg mixture until well coated and then throw the pieces into your gallon bag and shake until each piece is evenly coated.
Place chicken pieces in oil and cook for 5-7 minutes on each side or until golden brown.
Drain pieces onto paper towel and serve warm.

Serving suggestions: serve with any dip

COOK TIME
5 mins

CUISINE American

CALORIES 60 keal

TOTAL TIME 25 mins52.40/5 serverings

Healthier Sausage Gravy and Biscuits
Biscuits and Gravy are classic comfort food. Now, with this low-fat version, you can enjoy your favorite without by-pass surgery. One biscuit (two halves) plus sausage gravy goes from 540 calories to 216 (60% lower). The fat drops from 34 grams to only 3 (over 90% lower)—amazing.

Prep Time Cook Time Total Time 5 mins 20 mins 25 mins

Course: Breakfast Cuisine: American  Servings: 8 servings  Calories: 216keal Author: Dan Mikesell AKA DrDan
Ingredients
Low-Fat Biscuits 2 cups AP flour
:] 1 tablespoon baking powder Y2 teaspoon baking soda Y2 teaspoon salt
j 1 % cup non-fat yogurt
Gravy :l Yz pound turkey breakfast sausage :| 2 cups skim milk :| % cup AP flour 1 teaspoon seasoning salt | used Lowery's % Y2 teaspoon pepper or to taste

Instructions 1. Preheat the oven to 400° convection or 425° conventional oven.
2. Combine 2 cups AP flour, 1 tablespoon baking powder, 2 teaspoon baking soda, 2 teaspoon salt—mix well. Add 1 % cup nonfat yogurt. Fold in until all dry is incorporated.
- Make eight drop biscuits on a PAM sprayed baking pan. . Bake until golden brown—about 12 minutes.
. While biscuits are baking, brown %2 pound of turkey breakfast sausage.
o U & W
. Whisk together % cup flour with 2 cups skim milk. | used a Tupperware shaker. Slowly add the milk-flour mixture to the sausage over medium heat while whisking or mixing continuously.
7. Continue to mix, and this will start thickening in a few minutes. Add one teaspoon seasoning salt and ¥ teaspoon pepper {or to taste). Simmer another 5-10 minutes.
8. Server over biscuits cut in half.
Notes Pro Tips 1. Use zero fat ingredients - milk and yogurt. And the lowest fat turkey sausage possible. 2. Exact nutrition varies by the ingredients you use. 3. You can use Greek yogurt, but there will be more of a yogurt taste and may need a bit of milk added since it is less moist. 4. The serving is calculated with one biscuit cut in half and about 4 cup of gravy. If you want to use a more generous ¥ cup, then the calories only increase by 45 calories. 5. Use aluminum-free baking powder to prevent a metallic after-taste. 6. Store biscuits at room temperature air-tight for 2-3 days. They are very crumbly after that. 7. Store the gravy refrigerated for 3-4 days or frozen for 3-4 months.
i1y Make it Perfect First Time and Every Time W™ Don't miss out, check the full post. Almost every recipe includes easy step by step photo
instructions so you can visualize yourself cooking this recipe along with helpful tips and options.Serving suggestion: server as is
52.45/8 servings" RECIPE |

How to Make Eggs Benedict
PREP TIME COOK TIME TOTAL TIME 5mins 20 mins 25 mins SERVINGS
4

NOTE: Eggs benedict is also great made with slices of smoked salmon in
place of the bacon. If you are in or around New Jersey, try it with Taylor ham.

Ingredients

8 pieces of bacon or 4 pieces of Canadian bacon 2 tablespoons chopped parsley, for garnish
4 eggs
2 teaspoons white or rice vinegar
2 English muffins
Butter
Blender Hollandaise:
10 tablespoons unsalted butter (if using salted butter, omit the added salt)
3 egg yolks 1 tablespoon lemon juice 1/2 teaspoon salt
Dash of cayenne or tabasco

Create a List Make a list for the store or order

PRINT

SAVEITMethod

1. Cook the bacon
Heat a large skillet on medium low heat. Add the strips of bacon or the slices of Canadian bacon. Slowly fry, turning occasionally, until the bacon is browned on both sides, and if using strip bacon, much of the fat is rendered out (about 10 minutes).
Use tongs or a fork to remove the bacon from the pan, seton a paper towel to absorb the excess fat.
Don't pour the bacon fat left in the pan down the drain! Either sop it up with paper towels when it has cooled a bit, or pour it into a jar to be used later (see rendering bacon fat).
7. Bring poaching water to a simmer
While the bacon is cooking, bring a large saucepan two-thirdsfilled with water to a boil, then add the vinegar. Bring the water to a boil again, then lower the heat to a bare simmer.
3. Make Hollandaise sauce in blender
To make blender hollandaise, melt 10 Thsp unsalted butter,

Put 3 egg yolks, a tablespoon of lemon juice, 1/2 teaspoon salt in a blender, blend on medium to medium high speed for 20-30 seconds, until eggs lighten in color.
Turn blender down to lowest setting, slowly dribble in the hot melted butter, while continuing to blend. Taste for salt and acidity and add more salt or lemon juice to taste.
Transfer it to a container you can use for pouring and setit on a warm—but not hot—place on or near the stovetop.

4. Poach the eggs
Here is an easy method for poaching eggs. Essentially, working one egg at a time you crack an egg into a small bowl and slip it into the barely simmering water. Once it begins to solidify, you
can slip in another egg, until you have all four cooking. NTurn off the heat, cover the pan, and let sit for 4 minutes. (Remember which egg went in first, you'll want to take it out first.) When it comes time to remove the eggs, gently lift out with a slotted spoon.
Note that the timing is a little variable on the eggs, depending on the size of your pan, how much water, how many eggs, and how runny you like them. You might have to experiment a little with your set-up to figure out what you need to do to get the eggs exactly the way you like them.

Toast English muffins
As soon as all the eggs are in the poaching water, begin toasting your English muffins. If you can't get all the muffins toasted by the time the eggs are ready, gently remove the eggs from the poaching water and set in a bowl.

Assemble your Eggs Benedict
To assemble, butter one side of an English muffin. Top with two slices of bacon or 1 slice of Canadian bacon. You can trim the bacon to fit the muffin if you'd like.

Put a poached egg on top of the bacon, then pour some hollandaise over. Sprinkle some parsley over it all and serve at once.

Serving suggestion: server as is
$2.45/4 servingsCheeseburger Pizza
I've been dreaming of making this Cheeseburger Pizza for months! I've combined two of my favorites into one, out of this world party food!
Prep Time Cook Time


A 8F LikiLio | 4 =S ALAR110

Course: Dinner  Cuisine: American  Servings: 8 slices
Calories: 422 keal  Author: Shawn

Ingredients
For the Pizza Dough: e 1 3/4 cup all purpose flour e | pizza crust yeast, 1/4 oz. pkg. e 1 1/2 tsp sugar e 3/4 tsp salt e 2/3 cup very warm water e 3 tbsp oil
For the Pizza: ° legg e | tsp sesame seeds e /2 Ib. ground beef e | tbsp seasoned salt e 1/2 tsp black pepper e 1/2 onion, diced e 1/4 cup mayo ® 4 tbsp ketchup, divided e | tsp hot sauce e 2 cups colby jack cheese, shredded e 1/2 cup dill pickle chips, (sliced )drained e Mustard

Instructions
1. Preheat oven to 425 degrees F. Lightly grease a 12" pizza pan and set aside.
For the Pizza Douch:*

5 from 37 votesFor the Pizza:
13
Beat the egg with 1 tbsp water and brush the edges of the dough with the egg
wash mixture. Sprinkle the edges with the sesame seeds.
. Brown the hamburger in a skillet over medium heat with the seasoned salt, bl
pepper and diced onion. Cook until no longer pink and drain any excess fat.
. Meanwhile combine the mayo, 2 1/2 tbsp ketchup and the hot sauce in a smal:
dish and whisk until smooth. Spread this mixture over the base of the pizza
dough with the back of a spoon. Top with the cooked ground beef.
. Spread the shredded cheese over the top. Drizzle the remaining ketchup and
mustard over the top of the pizza, followed by the dill pickle chips.
. Bake for 12 to 15 minutes, or until center is bubbly and crust is golden brown
Let cool slightly before slicing. Enjoy!

Serving suggestion:have as is
$2.45/4 servings

Creamy Garlic Butter Shrimp Piccata
Creamy Garlic Butter Shrimp Piccata is the recipe of your dreams! Garlic butter shrimp coated in a rustic creamy garlic parmesan sauce with a hint of lemon, capers and spinach! Leave people wondering if there is a hidden chef in your kitchen! Quick and easy to make, ready on the table in less than 15 minutes!

Prep Time Cook Time Total Time 10 mins 10 mins 20 mins

4.85 from 13 votes

Course: Dinner  Cuisine: American  Servings: 4 people  Calories: 427kcal Author: Karina
Ingredients * 1tablespoon unsalted butter e 6 cloves garlic minced * 1pound (500 grams) shrimp, tails on or off * 1tablespoon olive oil e 1small brown shallot e 1/2 cup dry white wine*® e 11/2 cups reduced fat cream** e 3Salt and pepper, to taste s 3 cups baby spinach e 1/2 cup fresh grated Parmesan cheese e 1teaspoon cornstarch (mixed with 1 tablespoon of water) e 4 tablespoons fresh chopped parsley e 2 tablespoons fresh lemon juice, adjust to your tastes e 4 tablespoons rinsed and drained capers e Lemon slices, to serve Fresh chopped parsley (extra), to garnish
Instructions
1. Heat a large skillet over medium-high heat. Melt the butter and add in the garlic and fry until fragrant (about one minute). Add in the shrimp and fry two minutes on each side, until just cooked through and pink. Transfer to a bowl; set aside.
2. Fry the onion in the butter remaining in the skillet. Pour in the white wine (if using), and allow to reduce to half, while scraping any bits off of the bottom of the pan.
3. Reduce heat to low-medium heat, add the cream and bring to a gentle simmer, while stirring occasionally. Season with salt and pepper to your taste.
4. Add in the spinach leaves and allow to wilt in the sauce, then add in the parmesan cheese and allow sauce to gently simmer for a further minute or so until the cheese melts through the sauce. (For a thicker sauce, add the milkfcornstarch mixture to the centre of the pan, and continue to simmer while quickly stirring the mixture through until the sauce thickens.)
5. Add the shrimp back into the pan along with the lemon juice, capers and parsley; stir through. Take off the heat and serve immediately with lemon slices and extra parsley to garnish (if desired).
6. Serve over pasta, rice or steamed vea.
Notes *Use a good quality dry white wine such as a pinot griot or chardonnay.
White wine can also be substituted for chicken broth or left out completely. The flavour in the sauce will be altered.
**| use reduced fat cream (or light cream) for this recipe. Substitute with half and half if you wish, being careful not to bring the sauce to a boil or it may curdle. You can also use evaporated milk as a low calorie substitution.
Heavy or thickened cream may also be used and will not require thickening with cornstarch. Allow cream to reduce in a gentle simmer until thickened to your liking.


Serving suggestion: serve as is52.45/ 4 servings
FRIED RICE
SA WA A e Al

PN NN PN AN L prep time: 5 MINUTES cook time: 10 MINUTES total time: 15 MINUTES yield.' 4 -6 SERVINGS
INGREDIENTS 3 tablespoons bultter, divided
2 eggs, Whisked
2 medium carrots, peeled and diced 1 small white onion, diced
1/2 cup frozen peas
3 cloves garlic, minced
salt and black pepper 4 cups cooked and chilled rice (1 prefer short-grain white rice)
3 green onions, thinly sliced 3—4 tablespoons soy sauce, or more to taste 2 teaspoons gyster sauce (optional) 1/2 teaspoons toasted sesame oil
INSTRUCTIONS Heat 1/2 tablespoon of butter in a large sauté pan* over medium-high heat until melted. Add egg, and cook until scrambled, stirring occasionally. Remove egg, and transfer to a separate plate. Add an additional 1 tablespoon butter to the pan and heat until melted. Add carrots, onion, peas and garlic, and season with a generous pinch of salt and pepper. Sauté for about 5 minutes or until the onion and carrots are soft. Increase heat to high, add in the remaining 1 1/2 tablespoons of butter, and stir until melted. Immediately add the rice, green onions, soy sauce and oyster sauce (if using), and stir until combined. Continue sautéing for an additional 3 minutes to fry the rice, stirring occasionally. (! like to let the rice rest for a bit between stirs so that it can crisp up on the bottom.) Then add in the eggs and stir to combine. Remove from heat, and stir in

the sesame oil until combined. Taste and season with extra soy sauce, if needed.
- Serve immediately, or refrigerate in a sealed container for up to 3


Serving suggestion: have as is
$2.45/4-6 servings
Baked Salmon with Garlic and Dijon Prep Time: 5 minutes Cook Time: 15 minutes  Total Time: 20 minutes
Baked salmon with garlic and dijon is juicy, flaky and flavorful. An easy, excellent 20-minute salmon recipe. Learn how to bake perfect salmon every time!
Author: Natasha of NatashasKitchen.com Skill Level: Easy
Cost to Make: $10-$12
Keyword: baked salmon
Cuisine: American
Course: Main Course
Calories: 314 kcal
Servings: 4 people

Ingredients
11/2 Ib salmon filet
2 Thsp fresh parsley chopped
2 Thbsp light olive oil not extra virgin 2 Thsp fresh lemon juice
3 garlic cloves pressed
1/2 Tbsp Dijon mustard
1/2 tsp salt we use sea salt
1/8 tsp black pepper
1/2 Lemon sliced into 4 rings
Instructions
1. Preheat oven to 450°F and line a rimmed baking sheet with silpat or foil. Slice salmon into 4 portions and arrange them on a lined baking sheet, skin-side-down.
2. In a small bowl, combine: 2 Thsp parsley, 2-3 pressed cloves garlic, 2 Thsp oil and 2 Thsp lemon juice, 1/2 Thsp Dijon, 1/2 tsp salt, and 1/8 tsp pepper.
3. Generously spread the marinade over the top and sides of the salmon then top each piece with a slice of lemon.
4. Bake at 450°F for 12-15 min or until just cooked through and flaky. Don't over-cook.
Recipe Notes
Air Fryer Salmon: place salmon pieces on the wire basket, spread marinade over the top and air fry at 450°F for 6-7 minutes or just until cooked through.

Serving suggestion: serve with veggies, rice or a salad
$2.50/4 servingsSweet and Sour Chicken
Sweet and Sour chicken can be made at home.
® Course Main Course
® Cuisine Chinese
® Keyword Sweet and Sour Chicken .0 Prep Time 20 minutes
- Cook Time 15 minutes
e Total Time 35 minutes
“ Servings 6
EX Calories 555keal
@ Author Stephanie Manley Ingredients
EEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE
Sweet and Sour Sauce Ingredients 5 cups water
1 orange
1 lemon
2 or 3 slices fresh ginger
1 cup sugar
1/2 cup vinegar
1 cup ketchup
Red food coloring if desired
3 tablespoons cornstarch
3 tablespoons water
2 eggs divided use
1 pound chicken breasts
1/4 teaspoon white pepper
1/2 teaspoon granulated garlic 1/2 teaspoon salt
2 tablespoons rice cooking wine 4 tablespoons cornstarch divided use 2 1/4 cups self rising flour
1/4 teaspoon white pepper
1/4 teaspoon granulated garlic 1/4 teaspoon salt
1 1/2 cups water
2 tablespoons vegetable oil
Instructions
Sauce Directions Sweet and Sour Sauce Directions Wash the orange and the lemon well. Slice the fruit and sliced ginger and place intc a medium pot along with 5 cups of water. Bring the pot to a bail, and then
simmer for 30 minutes.
Aok ok
4.8 from 5 votes
Drain water with a sieve, press the fruit into the sieve, you want to get all of the water released. Place water into a pot and add 1 cup sugar, 1/2 cup vinegar, and 1 cup ketchup mix until well blended with a whisk. Heat the sauce over medium-high heat. Combine 3 tablespoons cornstarch and three tablespoons water in a small bowl. Slowly stream the liguid into the sauce
stirring constantly. The sauce will thicken.
When the sauce thickens, remove from heat. Store unused sauce in an air tight container.
Chicken Directions In a medium-sized bowl add 1 egg. Scramble egg with a fork. Cut chicken into small bite-sized pieces. Add chicken to the beaten egg. Add 1/4 teaspoon white pepper, 1/2 teaspoon granulated garlic, 1/2 teaspoon salt, 2 tablespoons rice cooking wine, 2 tablespoons of cornstarch. Stir to
cambine. The batter will look a mess.becomes a light brown. Remove chicken for about 1 minute, and then place chicken back in and fry for about an additional minute. Frying the chicken twice will make chicken extra crispy. Drain chicken on a wire wrack. Serve chicken with sweet and sour sauce.


Serving suggestion: serve with rice
$2.50/6 servingsIndian Chicken Curry

[ngredients: /2 Cup Finely Chopped Onion /2 Cup Finely Chopped Celery Olive Oil [/2 Cup Flour 2 Cupg Chicken Broth 2 Cups Tomato Juice/Puree | Teagpoon Worcegtershire Sauce Salt & Oepper -/2 Teagpoons Curry Pousder 4 Cups diced, cooked chicken 4 cupg hot, cooked rice
Directions: Lightly brown onion and celery in oil. Add flour and blend. Add Broth; cook until
thick, stirring congtantly. Add tomato puree, Worcesterghire sauce, seasoningg and chicken. Heat thoroughly. Serve over cooked rice.

Serving suggestion: serve over rice
$2.50/7-8 servings

Bonefish Grill Bang Bang Shrimp

Bang Bang Shrimp from the Bonefish Grill is crispy, creamy, sweet and spicy with just a few ingredients and tastes just like the most popular appetizer on the menu.

Course Main
Cuisine American
Keyword  Bonefish Grill Bang Bang Shrimp (Copycat)

Prep Time 10 minutes Cook Time 10 minutes Total Time 20 minutes

Ingredients
1/2 cup mayonnaise
1/4 cup Thai sweet chili sauce
1/4 teaspoon Sriracha
1 pound shrimp shelled and deveined 1/2 cup buttermilk
3/4 cup cornstarch
canola oil for frying
Ads will not be printed

Serving suggestion: serve over lettuce
$2.75/ 4 servings

Servings Calories Author

4 servings 413 kcal Sabrina Snyder

Instructions
1
In a small bowl add the mayonnaise, Thai sweet chili sauce and Sriracha and stir.
. In a second bowl add the shrimp and buttermilk and
stir to coat all the shrimp.
. Remove from the buttermilk and let excess liquid
drain away.
4. Coat the shrimp in cornstarch.
. In a heavy bottomed pan add 2-3 inches of canola oil
and heat to 375 degrees
. Fry the shrimp until lightly brown, 1-2 minutes on
each side.
. Once fried coat with the sauce and serve
immediately.Chicken Cutlets with Spicy
Arugula
(0]0]0
A A

Recipe courtesy of Valerie Bertinelli Show: Valerie's Home Cooking Episode: Dinner for My Best Friend!
Level: Easy Total: 55 min (includes chilling time)
Active: 35 min Yield: 4 servings
Ingredients:
« 4 chicken cutlets, 4 to 5 ounces each
« Kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper
« Kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper
« 2 large eggs
« 2 cups panko breadcrumbs
« 1/4 cup grated Parmesan, plus Parmesan shavings, for serving
« 2 teaspoons ltalian seasoning
- 1/2 teaspoon dried basil
« Canola oil, for frying
- Spicy Arugula, recipe follows
= Lemon wedges, for serving
Spicy Arugula:
« 1 1/2 tablespoons freshly-squeezed lemon juice (about 1/2 lemon)
« 1 tablespoon chopped shallots
- Heaping 1/2 teaspoon Dijon mustard
= Kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper
» Kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper
» 1/4 cup extra-virgin olive oil
< 4 ounces arugula
Directions:
1 Puta chicken cutlet between 2
pieces of plastic wrap and, using a rolling pin or the fiat side of a meat mallet, pound it out about 1/4 inch thick. Season all over with some salt and pepper. Repeat with the remaining 3 cutlets.
9 Whisk the eggs in a large shallow bowl. Spread the panko in another large shallow bowl and stir in the grated Parmesan, ftalian seasoning and basil. Have a large tray ready nearby. Dip a cutlet in the egg to coat all over, letting the excess drip off, and then press both sides into the panko, coating well. Set aside on the tray and repeat with the remaining 3 cutlets. Refrigerate the cutlets for 20

minutes.
Set a large skillet over medium-high heat, add some canola oil and heat until hot (you can check by dropping in a little bit of the panko mixture; it should sizzle). Add 2 chicken cutlets and cook until the bottoms are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip and cook until the other sides are golden brown and the chicken is
cooked through, about 2 more minutes. Transfer each cutlet to a dinner plate.
Carefully pour out and discard any remaining oil and crumbs in the skillet. Heat some more canola oil and cook the 2 remaining chicken cutlets. Top each cutlet with some Spicy Arugula and Parmesan shavings. Put a lemon wedge
on each plate and serve.
Spicy Arugula: Put the lemon juice, shallots, Dijon mustard and some salt and pepper in a small bowl. Slowly whisk in the olive oil. Taste and adjust the seasoning as
needed.
6 Put the arugula in another bowl. Drizzle some of the dressing around the sides of the bowl. Toss to lightly coat the arugula; taste and season with additional
salt and pepper if needed.

Serving suggestion: server with pasta
$3.00/ 4 servingsPhilly Cheesesteak
Prep Time: 15 minutes  Cook Time: 13 minutes  Total Time: 28 minutes
Philly Cheesesteak with tender ribeye steak, melted gooey provolone, and caramelized onions hugged by a toasted garlic butter hoagie roll.
Author: Natasha Kravchuk Skill Level: Easy
Cost to Make: $13-$16 Keyword: philly cheesesteak Cuisine: American
Course: Main Course Calories: 732 kcal Servings: 4 people

Ingredients
11b Ribeye steak trimmed and thinly sliced*
1/2 tsp Sea salt or to taste
1/2 tsp Black pepper or to taste
1 sweet onion (large), diced
8 slices provolone cheese mild (not aged provolone) 4 Hoagie Rolls sliced 3/4 through
2 Thsp unsalted butter softened
1 garlic clove pressed
2-4 Tbsp mayonnaise or to taste
Instructions 1. Slice hoagie rolls 3/4 of the way through with a serrated knife. Dice onions and thinly slice beef*
2. In a small bowl, stir together 2 Thsp softened butter with 1 pressed garlic clove. Spread garlic butter onto the cut sides of 4 hoagie roll. Toast the buns on a large skillet, flat cooktop or griddle on medium heat until golden brown then set aside.
3. Add 1 Thsp oil to your pan/cooktop and sautee diced onions until caramelized then transfer to a bowl.
4. Increase to high heat and add 1 Thsp oil. Spread the super thinly sliced steak in an even layer. Let brown for a couple of minutes undisturbed then flip and season with 1/2 tsp salt and 1/2 tsp black pepper. Sautee until steak is fully cooked through then stir in the caramelized onions.
5. Divide into 4 even portions and top each with 2 slices of cheese and turn off the heat so the cheese will melt without overcooking the meat.
6. Spread a thin layer of mayo on the toasted side of each roll. Working with one portion at a time, place a toasted bun over each portion and use a spatula to scrape the cheesy beef into your bun as you flip it over. Serve warm.
Serving suggestion: make some fries to go with it
5$3.25-4.00/4 servingsFOOD&WINE
Easy Chicken Fajitas
ok 4k ok
This easy recipe comes from eight-year-old Dani Shaub, who loves making these juicy chicken fajitas. She based the recipe on the ingredient list from a packet of fajita seasoning and likes that it involves lots of slicing (one of her favorite cooking tasks). Bonus: "everyone
Total: 30 mins Yield: 4

gets to participate and pick their own toppings," she says. They're great for kid and adult cooks. More Quick Mexican Dishes
Ingredients
1 teaspoon pure chile powder 1 teaspoon kosher salt
1/2 teaspoon ground cumin 1/2 teaspoon onion powder 1/4 teaspoon garlic powder
1 tablespoon cornstarch
1/4 cup water
3 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil
1 whole skinless, boneless chicken breast (about 1 pound), cut into 1/2-inch strips
1 green bell pepper—cored, seeded and cut into thin strips
1 medium onion, thinly sliced
2 tablespoons fresh lime juice, plus lime wedges for serving
8 flour tortillas, warmed in the microwave
Shredded lettuce, shredded cheddar cheese, salsa and sour cream, for serving
Directions
Step 1
In a resealable plastic bag, combine the chile powder with the salt, cumin, onicn powder, garlic powder, cornstarch, water and 2 tablespoons of the oil. Add the chicken, bell pepper and onion, seal and knead gently to coat. Refrigerate for 15 minutes.
Step 2
Heat the remaining 1 tablespoon of oil in a large nonstick skillet until shimmering. Empty the contents of the bag into the skillet and cook over high heat, stirring occasionally, until the vegetables are crisp-tender and the chicken is cooked through, about 6 minutes. Remove from the heat and stir in the lime juice.
Step 3 Transfer the chicken and vegetables to a large bowl and serve with the warmed tortillas, lettuce, cheese, salsa, sour cream and lime wedges.
Suggested Pairing
When it comes to pairing wine and fajitas—a situation that might occur for some people only after every last margarita on earth had been drained—here's a general thought. Fajitas, which are typically served with onions, grilled bell peppers, cheese, pico de gallo, possibly guacamole, maybe sour cream and who knows what other fixings, fall into the broad pairing category of “It isn't the meat, it's the sauce (or condiments).” Essentially, you're picking a wine to go with a mass of wildly different flavors. So you want one that goes with, more or less, anything. There's also a general pairing rule of thumb that suggests matching weight with weight —with a delicate piece of sole, pour a lighter wine; with something like a fajita, pour a wine with more heft. It's a handy guideline, especially when you don't want to think about nuances of flavor.With fajitas, following these two guidelines, there are a number of reds out there that would work just fine—Monastrell from Spain, Malbec from Argentina, a Grenache-based red from the South of France—but from California, go for Zinfandel.

© Copyright 2021 foodandwine.com. All rights reserved. Printed from https://www.foodandwine.com 05/06/2021

Serving suggestion: server with tortilla

53.45/4 servingsTraditional Veal Saltimbocca Recipe
This traditional Roman dish consists of veal and prosciutto and herbs. Enjoy this
recipe which explain its origin and its pairings as well!
1.8 6 0 ¢ ¢
4.18 from 28 votes
Course: Secondi  Cuisine: ltalian  Keyword: involtini, scaloppine Prep Time: 25 minutes Cook Time: b minutes  Total Time: 30 minutes
Servings: 4 people  Calories: 465kcal  Author: Nonna Box

Ingredients e 8 veal cutlets
e 8 slices prosciutto e § leaves fresh sage e 1 tsp Butter
* 1tbsp Olive ol
e 4 - % cl white wine ¢ 1 pinch salt
* 1 pinch pepper

Instructions
1. Trim any connective tissue and loose meat off of the veal scallops, then pound them thinly between two sheets of wax paper or plastic wrap.
2. Lay a thin slice of prosciutto and one sage leaf on top of each veal scallop, securing all of the layers together with a wooden toothpick.

3. Heat a large stainless steel or copper skillet on the stove and add a splash of
olive oil and a dab of butter.
4. Once the butter is melted, place the veal in the pan sage-side down and brown for up to one minute. Be careful not to leave it too long, or the prosciutto will
. Flip each piece over and brown for another minute or so. Season to taste with salt and pepper.
. Arrange the veal on a serving platter, remove the toothpicks, and cover with folil to keep warm.
. Add the wine to the hot pan and stir to scrape up the sucs stuck on the bottom. Bring it to a boil, then cook for two to three minutes or until the sauce is reduced. The sauce should be silky and just thick enough that when you pull a spoon across the bottom of a pan, it leaves a clean trail behind it.
. Remove the pan from the heat, stir in another dab of butter, and pour the sauce over the veal. Enjoy the veal saltimbocca while it's still hot!

Serving suggestion: server with pasta
$3.50/4 servingsPerfect Burger Recipe Prep Time: 20 minutes Cook Time: 10 minutes  Total Time: 30 minutes
The Best Burger Recipe! Sharing our secrets for making restaurant quality burgers, from the juiciest burger patties to the best buns and burger sauces.
Author: Natasha of NatashasKitchen.com Skill Level: Easy
Cost to Make: $14-$22
Keyword: burger recipe
Cuisine: American
Course: Main Course
Calories: 533 kcal
Servings: 4 burgers

Ingredients Burger Ingredients:
1 Ib ground chuck beef (80/20) salt to taste black pepper to taste
Classic Cheeseburger Toppings:
4 burger buns
4 slices medium cheddar cheese (thick sliced) 1 large tomato sliced into 8 rings
1/2 bunch green leaf lettuce
1/2 medium red onion thinly sliced into rings 1/2 cup dill pickle slices
Instructions
1. Slice, and prepare all of your burger toppings and sauces.
2. Spread the cut-side of the bun with softened or melted butter and toast the cut side on a skillet or on the grill until golden brown. You can toast the bun ahead or in the last couple of minutes with the burgers on the grill. Toasting the bun adds great flavor and prevents a soggy bun.
3. Preheat grill to medium heat. Divid beef into 4 portions and form patties that are about 1/2" thick and 1" wider than the burger buns. Season patties generously with salt and pepper.
4. Grill burger patties (indent-side-up) covered for 3-5 min each side on the grill. Flip burgers when juices are accumulating on top of burger and you have a good sear. Apply cheese in the last 1-2 minutes of grilling then cover with lid and cook until internal temperature of beef reaches 160°F.
Recipe Notes
How to Make Burger Sauces:
BBQ Aioli: 1/3 cup mayo + 1 tsp BBQ Sauce (we love sweet BBQ) Mustard Aioli: 1/3 cup mayo + 1 tsp yellow mustard
Dijon Aioli: 1/3 cup mayo + 1tsp dijon mustard
Fry Sauce: 1/3 cup mayo + 1 Thsp ketchup

Serving suggestion: make onion rings or fries
$3.50-5.50/ 4 servingsINGREDIENTS
4 center-cut swordfish steaks, about 6 ounces each, one-inch thick
Salt and freshly ground pepper to taste
w
tablespoons olive oil
N
teaspoons soy sauce
-
tablespoon red-wine vinegar
4 sprigs rosemary or 1 teaspoon dried
-
tablespoon finely chopped garlic
N
teaspoons ground coriander
-
teaspoon ground cumin
N
teaspoons grated lemon rind
PREPARATION
Step 1
Preheat a charcoal grill or broiler, or heat a grill pan.
Step 2
Sprinkle fish with salt and pepper on both sides. Place oil in a flat dish, and add soy sauce, vinegar, rosemary, garlic, coriander, cumin, lemon rind and pepper flakes. Blend well. Place fish steaks in marinade, coat well on both sides, cover with plastic wrap and let stand for 10 to 15 minutes.
Step 3
If the swordfish is to be cooked on a grill (or grill pan), place fish on grill and cook for 3 to 4 minutes. Turn and cook for 3 minutes more. Cook longer if desired. If it is to be cooked under a broiler, place fish on a rack and cook for 3 to 4 minutes on each side. Serve with a string bean salad.
Ya teaspoon red pepper flakes
Serving suggestion: serve with veggies, rice or a salad
$3.75/4 servings
Stuffed Peppers
[ngredients: 4 Depperg, any color { Ib ground beef or turkey (o ~rore ) [/4 cup bread crumbg 3-4 cloves garlie, minced

L Union, aiced
[Eqg
Garlic Powder
Pargley Flakeg
Salt & Depper
[ (28 0z) can Crughed Tomatoes or Puree Oregano
@rated Romano or Parmegan Cheege Cooked Rice
Directions: Boil peppers just to soften a bit. Remove from water & let cool.
Combine Ground meat, bread crurmbs, garlic, onion, egg & seagoninge. When peppers are cool enough to handle, add meat mixture into peppere. Put some tomato puree (or erushed) in bottom of pan, put ctuffed peppers upright on the “cauce”, then top with remaining “cauce”. Add oregano (and any other seaconinge you'd like to add to the sauce). Cover & cook until peppers are tender & meat ie cooked. Put rice on plate, place stuffed pepper on top. Top with more cauce and cheege.

Serving suggestion: serve with rice
54.00/per servings

Chicken Parmesan Recipe Prep Time: 10 minutes Cook Time: 25 minutes  Total Time: 35 minutes
Classic Chicken Parmesan recipe with parmesan-crusted tender chicken, topped with marinara and cheese. Chicken Parm is an easy, excellent chicken dinner.
Author: Natasha of NatashasKitchen.com Skill Level: Easy/Medium
Cost to Make: $18-$24
Keyword: chicken parmesan
Cuisine: Italian
Course: Main Course
Calories: 499 kcal
Servings: 4 people
Ingredients

2 chicken breasts (large), about 11/2 |bs
1/2 cup all-purpose flour
1tsp salt
1/2 tsp black pepper
2 large eggs beaten until frothy
1/2 cup Italian bread crumbs
1/2 cup parmesan cheese shredded or grated 2 Thsp Light olive oil to sauté
24 oz marinara sauce
4 0z mozzarella cheese (1 cup shredded)
1 Thsp fresh basil or parsley, chopped for optional garnish
Instructions
1
Trim chicken breasts and slice in half length-wise so you end up with 4 equal-thickness cutlets.* Season with salt and pepper.
. In a shallow bowl, stir together 1/2 cup flour, 1 tsp salt, and 1/2 tsp black pepper. In a second bowl, whisk 2 eggs until
frothy. In a third bowl, stir together 1/2 cup Italian bread crumbs with 1/2 cup parmesan cheese.
. Dip both sides of each chicken cutlet into the flour, tapping off excess, then dip in beaten eggs, letting excess egg drip off
and finally dip into the cheesy breadcrumbs, pressing cutlets into breading to ensure a thick, even coating of crumbs.
. Heat a large non-stick pan over medium heat and add enough olive oil to lightly coat the bottom of the pan. Once oil is
hot, add chicken in batches (don't crowd the pan), sautéing 3-4 min per side or until golden brown and just cooked through.
. Pour 112 cups of marinara into a 9x13 casserole baking dish. Arrange chicken over sauce in a single layer. Top each
chicken down the center with remaining 1 1/2 cups marinara, then cover with shredded mozzarella. Bake uncovered at 425°F for 15 minutes or until cheese is melted and sauce is bubbling. Garnish with chopped parsley or basil if desired.
Recipe Notes
*Cook's Tip: For large chicken breasts, pound your chicken between plastic wrap into even 1/3"-thick cutlets.

Serving suggestion: make penne pasta or anytime of pasta

$4.50-6.00/4 servings1 box (4.6 oz) Old El Paso™ taco shells (12 shells)

2. In 10-inch nonstick skillet, cook beef over medium-high heat 5 to 7 minutes, stirring frequently, until thoroughly cooked; drain. Stir in water and taco seasoning mix; heat tc boiling. Reduce heat; simmer uncovered 3 to 4 minutes, stirring frequently, until thickened.

@ 1 lb lean (at least 80%) ground beef

(%) 2/3 cup water

1 package (1 oz) Old El Paso™ taco seasoning mix

Servings suggestion: make all the fillings for taco or serve with guacamole
54.50/ 8 servings

1. Heat taco shells as directed on box.

3. Spoon beef into taco shells.Chicken Quesadillas
by Ree Drummond

Ingredients:
12 large flour tortillas
2 tablespoons olive oil
2 1/2 cups grated cheese (Monterey Jack is the best) 2 pounds skinless chicken breasts
Pico de Gallo, for serving, recipe follows
Salt and pepper
2 tablespoons taco or Cajun seasoning mix
1 large onion, cut in half and then into slices
1 green bell pepper, seeded and sliced into strips 1 red bell pepper, seeded and sliced into strips
1 yellow bell pepper
12 tablespoons butter, for frving

Pico de Gallo:
12 Roma tomatoes (slightly under ripe is fine) 3 yellow or red onions
2 cups fresh cilantro leaves
2 to 3 jalapenos
1 lime
Salt @\} pa

ae 1Directions:Heat 1 tablespoon of the olive oil in a skillet over high heat. Sprinkle the chicken with salt, pepper and taco seasoning. Add the chicken to the skillet and saute over medium-high heat until done, about 4 minute per side. Remove from the skillet and dice into cubes. Sct aside.
Add the remaining 1 tablespoon olive oil to the skillet over high heat. Throw in the onions and peppers and cook until the peppers have a few dark brown/black areas, 3 to 4 minutes. Remove and set aside.
Sizzle 1/2 tablespoon of the butter in a separate skillet or griddle over medium heat and lay a flour tortilla in the skillet. Then build the quesadillas by layimng grated cheese on the bottom tortilla, and then arranging the chicken and cooked peppers. Top with a little more grated cheese and top with a second tortilla.
When the tortilla 1s golden on the first side, carefully flip the quesadilla to the other side, adding another 1/2 tablespoon butter to the skillet at the same time. Continue cooking until the second side is golden. Repeat with the remaining tortillas and fillings.
Cut cach quesadilla into wedges and serve with Pico de Gallo.
Pico de Gallo
Dice up equal quantities of tomatoes and onions. Roughly chop the cilantro.
Now, slice 1 or 2 jalapenos in half. With a spoon, scrape out the seeds. (IF you like things spicy, leave in some of the white membranes.) Dice the jalapenos very finely; vou want a hint of heat
and jalapeno flavor, but you don't want to cause any fires. Now dump the four ingredients into a4 howl.

Shice the me in hall and squeeze the juiee from half the lime into the bowl. Sprinkle with salt, and stir together until combined. Be sure to taste the pico de gallo and adjust the scasonings, adding salt or more diced jalapeno if needed.

Serving suggestion: make guacamole or salsa
54.50/6 servingsOven Fried Steak

Ingredients Crust:
[ Ib Cube Steake
/3 Cup Flour
[ Teagpoon Seagoning Salt
3/4 Cup Panko Bread Crumbe (l uge Whole Wheat ones)
2 Egge
2 Tablespoone Milk (I uge Skim) Ingredients Gravy:
2 Cupe Milk (1 uge Skim)
2 Tablegpoong Flour
/2 Teagpoon Salt
[/4 Teagpoon Freghly Ground Pepper Directions:
Preheat Oven to 400 degrees F. Line cookie sheet with foil (for eagy clean up) and epray with cooking epray.
Combine flour, seagoning salt and Panko. In separate bowl beat egge and milk. Coat steaks in erumb mixture. Dip the coated steak into eqg mixture, and then re-coat in crumb mixture. Place steak on prepared cookie sheet. Spray top of steake with cooking spray. Bake O minutes, turn over, spray again with cooking spray. Bake an additional Il minutee or until criepy and elightly golden brown.
To make gravy: Pour milk into pan. Wigh in remaining ingredients (flour, salt & pepper). Cook over medium-high heat, etirring constantly about 5 minutes or until gravy thickene  Qerve over eteake

Serving suggestion: Serve with mashed potatoes and green beans.

S10 /4 servings

Mac and Cheese | 00C
AT T
Recipe courtesy of Ina Garten Show: Barefoot Contessa | Episode: What Are Friends For?


Yield: 6to 8 servings - . - Directions: Level: Easy 1 Preheat the oven to 375 degrees F. di :
Ingr edients: 2  Drizzle oil into a large pot of boiling
salted water. Add the macaroni and o Koshersalt cook according to the directions on the * Vegetabls oil package, 6 to 8 minutes. Drain well. e 1 pound elbow macaroni or cavatappi » 1 quart milk 3 Meanwhile, heat the milk in a small = 8 tablespoons (1 stick) unsalted butter, saucepan, but don't boil it. Melt ﬁ’ l%)lespoons of butter in a large (4-quart)
divided e 1/2 cup all-purpose flour
pot and add the flour. Cook over low heat for 2 minutes, stirring with a whisk. While whisking, add the hot milk and cook for a minute or two more, until
» 12 ounces Gruyere, grated (4 cups) thickened and smooth. Off the heat, add the Gruyere, Cheddar, 1 tablespoon salt, ® 8 ounces extra-sharp Cheddar, grated (2 pepper, and nutmeg. Add the cooked macaroni and stir well. Pour into a 3-quart cups) baking dish.
» 1/2 teaspoon freshly ground black pepper 5 s 4 Slice the tomatoes and arrange on top. Melt the remaining 2 tablespoons of
butter, combine them with the fresh bread crumbs, and sprinkle on the top. Bake for 30 to 35 minutes, or until the sauce is bubbly and the macaroni is browned on the top.
® 3/4 pound fresh tomatoes (4 small) 11/2 cups fresh white bread crumbs (5 slices, crusts removed)
Copyright 2002, Barefoot Contessa Family Style, All Rights Reserved Qﬂ(\‘\(_ BARSAC . P Soz. Treey Y ’ oz Ay Sped | Soz e Ned.
Serving suggestion: Serve with sloppy joes
$10/6-8 servings

The next time I make it, I plan on making a triple batch to have extra to freeze the leftovers. YIELD: 4 SERVINGS
PANERA CREAMY TOMATO SOUP COPYCAT RECIPE
TOTAL TIME:30 MINUTES
To make your meal perfect, make a grilled cheese with fresh thick crusty sourdough bread, havarti cheese and a
ton of real butter. That is my PERFECT grilled cheese.
INGREDIENTS:
« 2 tablespoons olive oil
+ 4 garlic cloves, minced
« 1 large yellow onion, sliced
+ 2 (28 0z) cans San Marzano peeled tomatoes + 1 cup chicken stock (or vegetable stock)
- 1 tablespoon sugar
* 1/4 cup heavy cream
+ 8 large fresh basil leaves, roughly chopped
* 1/4 teaspoon dried oregano
* 1/2 teaspoon of red pepper flakes
+ kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper, to taste + 1/3 cup shredded parmesan cheese, optional
* buttery croutons, optional topping
DIRECTIONS:
1. In a heavy bottomed pot (or dutch oven), heat olive oil over medium-high heat. Add garlic and saute for 30
seconds — until fragrant. Add onion and cook, stirring as needed, until translucent — about 8 minutes.
2. Add San Marzano peeled tomatoes (juice and all), chicken stock, and sugar. Bring to a low simmer. Cook uncovered, for 12 minutes or until it has thickened.
3. Add the heavy cream, basil, oregano, red pepper flakes and season to taste with salt and pepper.
4. Using an immersion blender (or carefully transfer soup to a blender), puree soup until there are no large chunks left.
5. OPTIONAL: stir in parmesan cheese and serve topped with buttery croutons.
. Store in an airtight container in the fridge for up to 5 days or in the freezer for up to 3 months.
This delicious recipe brought to you by THE NOVICE CHEF
s ——
Serving suggestion: make a grilled cheese to go with it
i$10/4 servings

Recw’pelmage servings

Easy Baked Coconut Shrimp
TOTAL TIME: 30 mins COURSE: Appetizer CUISINE: American These Easy Baked Cocanut Shrimp are crisp, golden and delicious served a sweet and spicy apricot
dipping sauce. Sef these out on a platter in front of some hungry guests and | guarantee they will disappear!!
Ingredients
11b 24 large raw shrimp, peeled and deviened (weight after peeled) 1/2 cup + 1 tbsp shredded sweetened coconut
1/2 cup + 1 tbsp panko crumbs (or gluten-free panko)
2 tbsp all purpose or gluten-free flour (you will only use 1 thsp)
1 large egg
pinch salt
non-stick spray (| used my misto)

YIELD: 8 servings
5 from 22 votes
For the Sweet and Spicy Dipping Sauce:
« 1/2 cup apricot preserves (you can use sugar free if you wish) « 1 thsp rice wine vinegar « 3/4 tsp crushed red pepper flakes
Instructions Oven Method:
For the sauce, combine all the ingredients and place in a small bowl.
Preheat oven to 425°F. Spray a non-stick baking sheet with cooking spray.
Combine coconut flakes, panko crumbs and salt in a bowl.
Place the flour on a small dish. Whisk egg in ancther bowl.
Lightly season shrimp with salt. Dip the shrimp in the flour, shaking off excess, then into the egg, then in the coconut crumb mixture.
ey o B N
Lay shrimp on the cookie sheet then spray the top of the shrimp with more cooking spray; bake in the middle rack for about 10 minutes. Turn shrimp over then cook another 6-7 minutes or until cooked though. Remove from oven and serve with dipping sauce.
Air Fryer Method:
For the sauce, combine all the ingredients and place in a small bowl.
Preheat air fryer to 375°F. Spray a non-stick baking sheet with cooking spray.
Combine coconut flakes, panko crumbs and salt in a bowl.
Place the flour on a small dish. Whisk egg in another bowl.
Lightly season shrimp with salt. Dip the shrimp in the flour, shaking off excess, then into the egg, then in the coconut crumb mixture. Lay shrimp on the cookie sheet then spray both sides of the shrimp with more cooking spray.
Spray the air fryer basket and cook the shrimp, in 2 batches, 4 minutes on one side, turn cook 2 minutes (6 min total). Repeat with the remaining shrimp. Serve with dipping sauce.
Serving: 3shrimp, 1 tbsp sauce, Calories: 1681.5keal, Carbohydrates: 224, Protein: 10g, Fat: 3.5g, Sodium: 164mg, Fiber: 29, Sugar: 15.59 Blue Smart Points: 5 Green Smart Points: 6  Purple Smart Points: §  Points +: 4
ol g B T 3

Serving suggestion: make any type of sauce

$10/8 servingsMANUAL METHOD
1. 2.
Sift flour and salt into a mixing bowl.
Gradually add eggs and oil to flour, mixing with a spoon. As the mixture becomes lumpy, begin to press together and knead with your hands. If mixture seems too dry and grainy, add one tablespoon of water at a time until the mixture holds together into a ball.
. Remove dough from the mixing bowl and begin to knead dough for 2 minutes on a lightly
floured dough board or table top.
. Cover the dough with a bow! and let the dough rest for 30 minutes. Allowing the dough to
rest will improve the texture of the dough.
TO COOK RAVIOLI:
1. 2
Bring a large pot of water to a boil. Salt the water. You want your water as salty as the sea.
Add the ravioli in batches. About 10- 12 at a time. Don't overcrowd. Bring the water back to a gentle simmer and cook for about 3-4 minutes. If the ravioli is frozen, cook for an additional minute.
. Remove with a slotted spoon or spider to a serving dish. Continue cooking the rest of the
ravioli. Serve with your favorite sauce or just with extra-virgin olive oil, butter, sea salt, and freshly ground black pepper. Sprinkle with fresh herbs.Homemade Italian Ravioli with Meat & Cheese Filling
A flavorful meat and cheese filling for the homemade ravioli dough pockets. It's a versatile filling that can be spiced up with hot pepper flakes and garlic or a different type of cheese can be added if you would prefer to make it "all your way." The pasta dough can be used for any type of pasta shape or dish. Every ltalian dish is
improved 1000% by making your own pasta.

4.43 from 130 votes

Prep Time 40 mins


Course: Main Course  Cuisine: Italian  Servings: 15 people  Calories: 327kcal
Ingredients
MEAT CHEESE RAVIOLI FILLING
® & & @ @
2 eggs beaten
2 Tbs parsley chopped
12 oz beef chuck ground
12 oz pork sausage country style
16 oz ricotta cheese
1 cup parmesan cheese grated
1 Tbs olive oil extra virgin
1tsp kosher salt
1 cup spinach leaves baby spinach chopped.
PASTA DOUGH
14 oz. all-purpose flour 3 1/8 cups 4 eggs large
1 Thbs olive oil extra virgin
1tsp Kosher salt
Instructions
FOR THE MEAT RAVIOLI FILLING
1. 2.
Fry the meat in olive oil until well browned. Drain the meat on paper towels
When the meat cools a little put it into a large bowl and mix in the chopped spinach. chopped parsley, beaten eggs and the rest of the ingredients, add salt and pepper to taste.
Put the filling into the food processor bowl and pulse several times until the mixture is fine.
Return the filling to the mixing bowl and refrigerate. (The filling is easier to work with when refrigerated.) The filling will give you enough for a double batch -- making about 80 100+ ravioli. The filling can be frozen.
PASTA DOUGH THE FOOD PROCESSOR METHOD
1. 2 3,
Using the metal blade pulse the flour and salt together. Lightly stir the eggs and olive oil in a measuring cup.
With the processor running, add the egg/oil mixture all at once through the feed tube until a ball is formed then pulse several times. The dough should be slightly sticky to the touch and should spring back when you press it.
. Form the dough into a smooth ball and place on a dough board or tabletop and cover with
a bowl for 30 minutes.

Cook Time 20 mins

Total Time 1 hrServing suggestion: make meatballs
$10/15 servingsProvenzano Sauce

Brown ham hocks, spareribs & sausage in oil. Add ham hocks & sausage to sauce. Brown meatballs, set aside. Sauté onion in oil. Add to sauce. Put spareribs in saue about 2 hours before sauce is done. Put meatballs in about 1 hour before sauce is done. Let sauce simmer on low for 4-5 hours.

1 can Crushed Tomatoes
2 Cans Tomato Puree (Red Pack is best)
Y2 amount of water
2 Thlsp Salt
Oregano
Basil
Garlic, 4-5 cloves pressed (or Garlic Powder) 1 large or 2 small Onions
Meatballs
1 1b ground beef
2 eggs
1-2 handfuls breadecrumbs
dash salt & pepper
Parsley flakes
Garlic, 1-3 cloves pressed (or Garlic Powder)

Serving suggestion: server over some pasta$10/8 servings

Ingredients Kosher salt 1 pound whole wheat fusilli 1/2 cup walnuts halves 2 cloves garlic 1 1/2 cups packed baby arugula 1 1/2 cups packed chopped kale 1 cup fresh basil leaves 1/2 cup grated Pecorino-Romano, plus more for garnish 1 tablespoon fresh lemon juice 1/2 teaspoon sea salt 1/2 teaspoon freshly ground black pepper
3/4 cup extra-virgin olive oil, plus more for drizzle

Directions 1.  Bring alarge pot of water to a boil and salt generously. Add the pasta and cook until al dente. Drain, reserving about 1 cup pasta water.
2. Roughly chop some of the walnuts and set aside. Pulse the remaining walnuts and garlic together in a food processor, then add the arugula, kale, basil, cheese, lemon juice, sea salt and pepper and pulse to puree. With the motor running, slowly add the oil and process until smooth. The pesto can be refrigerated in an airtight container for up to 1 week.
3. Add the pesto to a large bowl. Add the hot pasta and toss to coal, adding a splash of pasta water to thin, if necessary. Transfer to a serving bowl and garnish with more cheese, a drizzle of olive oil and a sprinkle of chopped walnuts.

Credit: Katie Lee on The Kitchen

Serving suggestion: server with salmon$10/5-7 servings CHICKEN ALFREDO BAKED ZITI
o 0} o

INGREDIENTS:
* 12 ounces ziti (or any pasta shape) » 2 cups shredded, cooked chicken (about 2 small chicken breasts)
+ 1 batch alfredo sauce (see below) « 11/2 cups shredded mozzarella cheese (1 used 2% low fat) * (optional toppings: additional shredded Parmesan cheese, chopped fresh parsley)
- 1 Tbsp. olive all
- 4 cloves garlic, minced
+ 3 Tbsp. flour
* 1 cup chicken broth
* 1 cup low-fat milk (I used 1%)
- 3/4 cup freshly-grated Parmesan cheese - 1/2 tsp. salt
= 1/4 tsp. black pepper
DIRECTIONS:
1. Preheat oven to 375 degrees F.
2. Cook the pasta al dente in a large stockpot of well-salted boiling according to package instructions. Drain. Return pasta to the stockpot and add chicken and alfredo sauce. Gently toss to combine until the pastaiis evenly coated.
3. Pour half of the pasta into a greased 11x7-inch or 9x13-inch baking dish. Sprinkle evenly yfath 1 cup of cheese. Layer the remaining half of the pasta evenly on top. Sprinkle evenly with the remaining 1/2 cuyf/ cheese.
4. Bake for 20-25 minutes until the cheese is melted and just barely starts to turn golden. Remove and serve
immediately, sprinkled with additional toppings if desired.
1. Heat olive oilin a large saute pan over medium-high heat. Add garlic and saute one minute, stirring occasionally, until fragrant. Sprinkle with flour, and stir to combine. Saute for an additional minute to cook the flour, stirring occasionally.
2. Slowly add chicken broth, whisking to combine until smooth. Whisk in milk, and bring the mixture to a simmer. Let cook for an additional minute until thickened, then stir in Parmesan cheese, salt and pepper until the cheese melted.
Remove from heat and set aside.

ALFREDO SAUCE CHICKEN. CHICKEN BROTH FLOUR GARLIC MILK MOTZARELLA CHEESE PARMESANServing suggestion: Has it as is
$10/5-7 servings

Fried Calamari
Recipe courtesy of Giada De Laurentiis

Show: Everyday Italian Episode: italian Restaurant Classics
. i - Level: Intermediate Directions: Total: 30 min Prep: 10 min 1 Pour anough oil inta a heavy ) large saucepan o reach the Cook: 20 min depth of 3 inches. Heat over
medium heat to 350 degrees F. Mix the flour, parsley, salt, and
. epperin a larga bowl. Worki Ingl.ed-lentS: :‘I :!rpnall trab:hrf: toss the sqﬁ into the flour mixture to coat. Carafully add the sguid to the oil and fry until crisp and very pale golden, about 1 minute per batch. Using tongs or a slotted spoon, transfer the fried calamari to a paper-towel lined plate to drain.
Yield: 6 servings

= Vegetable oil, for deep-frying = 1 pound clean squid with tentacles, bodies cut into 1/3- o 1/2-inch-thick
rings = 2 cups all-purpose flour £ Place the fried catamari and lemon wedges on a clean plate. Sprinkle » 2 tablespoons dried parsley with salt. Serve with the marinara sauce.
= Salt and freshly ground black peppar y = 2 lamons, cut into wedges SImple Tomato Sauce: * 1 cup simple tomato sauce, recips follows Yield: 6 cups
or jarred marinara sauce, warrnad 2 _ In a large cassercle pol, heat oil over madium high heat. Add onion and SImple Tumatu Sau‘ce. garlic and saute until soft and translucent, about 5 to 10 minutes. Add * 1/2 cup axtra-virgin olive oil celery and carrots and season with salt and pepper. Saute until all the vagetables are soft, about 5 te 10 minutes. Add tomatoes and bay leaves and simmer uncovered on lbow heat for 1 hour o until thick. Remove bay heaves and check for seasoning. If sauce still tastes acidic, add unsalted butter, 1 tablespoon at a time to rownd out the Ravors.
= 1 small enion. chopped = 2 cloves gardic, chopped = 1 stalk celary, chopped = 1 carrol, chopped
* Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper 4 Add 142 the tomato sauce into the bowl of a food processor. Process = 2 (32-ounce) cans crushed tomatoes until smosth. Continue with remaining tomato sauce.
= 2 dried bay leaves
« 4 tablaspoons unsalted butter, optional 5 If not using all the sauce, allow it to cool completely and pour 1 to 2 cup
portions into freezer plastic bags. This will freeze up to & months.

age 1

Serving suggestion: server with tomato sauce

$12.50/6 servings

P -89allrecipes
Egg Drop Soup (Better than Restaurant Quality!) Prep: 5 mins
o Wk v
After many many trips to different Chinese restaurants looking for a good bowl of egg drop soup, | decided to take it upon myself to create what | feel is the ultimate in egg drop soup. | hope you enjoy it~ Servings: 1
as much as | do!
Ingredients
1 cup chicken broth
V4 teaspoon soy sauce
V4 teaspoon sesame oil
1 teaspoon cornstarch (Optional) 2 teaspoons water (Optional)
1egg, beaten
1drop yellow food coloring {Optional)
1 teaspoon chopped fresh chives
Y teaspoon salt (Optional)
V2 teaspoon ground white pepper (Optional)
Cook: 5 mins
Total: 10 mins

Yield: 1 cup
Directions
Step1
In a small saucepan, combine the chicken broth, soy sauce and sesame oil. Bring to a boil. Stir together the cornstarch and water to dissolve cornstarch; pour into the boiling broth. Stir gently while you pour in the egg and yellow food coloring if using. Season with chives, salt and pepper before serving.
Nutrition Facts Per Serving: 112 calories; protein 7.5g; carbohydrates 4.8g; fat 6.7g; cholesterol 191mg; sodium 1395.7mg.

© Copyright 2021 allrecipes.com. All rights reserved. Printed from https://www.allrecipes.com 05/20/2021

Serving suggestion: have as is
$1.25/1 servingChicken Salad
#§§ Recipe courtesy of Food Network Kitchen
Level: Easy Total: 30 min Active: 30 min Yield: 4 servings
Ingredients:
* 4 cups diced poached chicken, recipe folbows.
1 stalk celery. cut into 1/4-inch dice
4 scallions, trimmed and thinly sliced or
1,/4 cup sweet onion cut into 1/4-inch
dice
« 1 172 teaspoons finely chopped fresh tarragon or fresh dill
= 2 tsblespoons finely chopped parsley
* 1 cup prepared or homemade maysnnaisa
= 2 teaspoons strained freshly squeezed lemon juice
« 1 teaspoon Dijon mustard
» 2 teaspoons kosher salt
Freshly ground black pepper
POACHED CHICKEN FOR SALADS:
= 10 sprigs parsbey
= 2 sprigs frash thyme « 1 small onion, halved * 1 small carrot, hakved
= 1 stalk celery. hahved
« 3 pounds bone-in, skin-on chicken breasts halves, fat trimmed
* 5 to § cups chicken brath, homemade or low-sodium store bought
Directions:
1 Toss together the chicken. celery, scallions, dill and parsley in a large bowl.
2 In asmall bowl, whisk togather the mayonnaise, lemaon juice, mustard, salt and pepper to taste. Add to the chicken and mix gently until combined. Refrigarate until ready to serva.
POACHED CHICKEN FOR SALADS:
Yield: 4 cups cubed chicken or 4 to 6 servings

3 Put the parsley, thyme. onion, carrot, celery. and chicken breastsina
medium saucepan. Cover with the broth, and bring just to a boil. Lower the heat to very low and cover. Poach the chicken until firm to the touch, about 20 minutes. Remove the pan from the hieat, uncover and cool the chicken in the [iquid for 30 minutes.
Transfer the chicken to a cutting board and reserve the liquid. Bone and skin the chicken and roughly chop the meat inte about 1-inch pieces. Discard the bones and skin.
Strain the broth and store, covered, in the refrigerator for 3 days or freaze for later use. Remove any fat from the surface of the broth befora using.
Cook's Note
Serve on a bed of lettuce with sliced tomatoes, in half an avocade or in a chicken club sandwich made with artisanal bread, crispy smoked bacon, vine-ripened tomatoes and lettuce.


Serving suggestion: bacon is optional
$1.45/4 servingsonce upon a chef
WITH JENN SEGAL
Homemade Caesar Salad Dressing By Jenniter Segal, adapted from Gourmet magazine
My fasitly loves this vich wsd coeamy Cagsar salad dressing, Its swob overly garlicky or fighy — it% jiust right.
Servings: Makes 1-1/3 cups (enough for about 10 starter salads) Total Time: 10 Minutes
INGREDIENTS
2 wmall garlic cloves, minced
1 tenspoon anchovy paste (found near the canned tuna in the supermagket)
2 tablespoons freshly squeezed lemon fuice. from one lemon
1 teaspoon Dijon mustard (1like the brand Maille)
1 teaspoon Worcestershine sauce
1 cup mayonnaise, best quality such as Hellmann's Real
142 cup freshly grated Parmigiano- Reggiano
174 teaspoon salt
1 teaspoon freshly ground black pepper

INSTRUCTIONS
T a medium bowl, whisk wgether the garlic, anchovy paste, lemon julce, Dijon mustard and Worcestershire sauce, Add the mayonnaise, Parmiglano-Reggiano, salt and pepper and whisk until well combined. Taste and adjust to your liking. The dressing will keep well in the (eidge for sbout s week,
NUTRITION INFORMATION
Powered by i Per serving (10 servings)
Sarving size: About 2 tablespoons Calories: R4
. @ Page 1

1 Serving suggestion: make grilled chicken
$2.50/10 servingsTIELLYE & DEKYINUD
Panera Creamy Tomato Soup
Copycat Recipe
To make your meal perfect, make a grilled cheese with fresh thick crusty sourdough bread, havarti cheese and a ton of real butter. That is my PERFECT grilled cheese.
PREP TIME COOK TIME TOTAL TIME 10 minutes 30 minutes 40 minutes

INGREDIENTS
2 tablespoons olive oil
4 garlic cloves, minced
1 large yellow onion, sliced
2 (28 0z) cans San Marzano peeled tomatoes 1 cup chicken stock (or vegetable stock)
1 tablespoon sugar
1/4 cup heavy cream
8 large fresh basil leaves, roughly chopped 1/4 teaspoon dried oregano
1/2 teaspoon of red pepper flakes
kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper, to taste
1/3 cup shredded parmesan cheese, optional

INSTRUCTIONS
L
[}
o
In a heavy bottomed pot (or dutch oven), heat olive oil over medium-high heat. Add garlic and saute for 30 seconds - until fragrant. Add onion and cook, stirring as needed, until translucent about 8 minutes.
Add San Marzano peeled tomatoes (juice and all), chicken stock, and sugar. Bring to a low simmer. Cook uncovered, for 12 minutes or until it has thickened.
Add the heavy cream, basil, oregano, red pepper flakes and season to taste with salt and pepper
Using an immersion blender (or carefully transfer soup to a blender), puree soup until there are no large chunks lefi.
OPTIONAL: stir in parmesan cheese and serve topped with buttery croutons.
Store in an airtight container in the fridge for up to 5 days or in the freezer for up to 3 months,

Serving suggestion: serve with grilled cheese
$2.50/4 servingsAppetizers Cheesy Italian Arancini Rice Balls
A classic ltalian dish, I've made these bite size to be finger food but they are typically made larger to serve as a meal or appetiser! This makes 25 mini Arancini balls about the size of a golf ball. :) Great for making ahead - they keep in the fridge for 3 days, then just reheat at 350F/180C for 10 minutes!


ok ok
5 from 41 votes
Prep Time Cook Time Total Time 30 mins 1 hr 1 hr 30 mins

Course: Appetizer Cuisine: Italian  Servings: 25 Author: Nagi | RecipeTin Eats
Ingredients
Baked Risotto
e 2 tbsp butter e 2 garlic cloves , minced e 1 small onion, finely diced (white, yellow, brown) e 11/2 cups risotto rice (arborio) e 1/2 cup white wine (or substitute with broth/stock or water) e 3 1/2 cups chicken broth/stock e 1 cup milk Rice Mixture e 1egg e 1 cup grated cheddar cheese e 3/4 cup grated mozzarella cheese e 21/2 tbsp finely chopped fresh parsley , or 11/2 tbsp dried parsley (Note 1) e 1/2 tsp salt e Pepper Coating e 1/2 cup plain flour e 1/2 tsp salt e Black pepper e 2eggs e 2 cups panko breadcrumbs e Cooking ail (I used vegetable oil)Instructions
1. Preheat oven to 180C/350F.
2. Melt butter in a skillet over medium heat. Add garlic and onion and cook for 5 minutes until soft.
3. Add rice and stir until grains turn translucent. Add wine and turn up the heat to medium high. Cook until liquid is mostly absorbed/evaporated.
4. Add chicken broth and milk. Stir, bring to simmer, cover, then transfer to oven. Baked, covered, for 30 to 40 minutes until all liquid is absorbed and rice is tender.
5. Remove from oven and allow to cool. Add Rice Mixture Ingredients and mix to combine. Cover and transfer to refrigerator for at least 3 hours or preferably overnight.
Coating
1. Mix flour, salt and pepper in a shallow bowl, eggs in another (lightly beaten) and panko in a third shallow bowl.
2. Measure out a level (packed) ice cream scoop of rice mixture (about 2 1/2 tbsp) and roll into a ball. (Note 2)
3. Rollin flour, then dredge in egg mixture, then coat in panko, pressing to coat. (Note 3) Repeat with remaining mixture.
Cook
1. In a medium saucepan, pour in 1"/2.5cm depth of oil and heat over medium high heat.
2. Toss in a breadcrumb and if it starts sizzling immediately, the oil is hot enough.
3. Carefully transfer a few balls into the hot oil, using a spoon. Turn frequently so they cook golden evenly, and when they are a deep golden brown, remove onto a paper towel lined plate to drain.
4, Repeat with remaining balls.
To Serve 1. Serve with Marinara Sauce (optional) (Note 4) sprinkled with finely chopped fresh parsley
if desired.Notes 1. You can substitute with any other Italian-esque herbs or combination you want e.g. basil, thyme, oregano.
2. When the rice is refrigerated, it should become sticky and firm enough to roll into firm balls. If not, just add a wee bit of panko breadcrumbs (2 tbsp at a time) which will help absorb excess moisture and hold together.
3. | find the fastest way to do this is to measure the scoops out first into a baking tray, then roll them, then coat them in batches.
4. Quick Marinara Dipping Sauce - Heat 1 tbsp of oil in a small saucepan with 1/4 cup of very finely chopped onion and 1 garlic clove, crushed. Cook over medium heat for 2 minutes, then add 1 cup of tomato passata (pureed canned tomatoes, also known as tomato sauce in America), 1/2 tsp onion powder, 1 tsp mixed ltalian herbs (or sub with other herbs), pinch of chili flakes (optional), salt and pepper. Cook for 5 minutes until thick, remove from heat and allow to cool.
5. These can be baked, but the crumb is not quite the same deep golden brown, but it's still delicious! To bake, after rolling the balls, place them in the fridge for 20 minutes to firm them up again. Then coat in panko as per recipe, drizzle with oil OR generously spray with olive oil and baking in a 200C/390F oven for 20 minutes or until golden brown.
6. | know some people like to stuff a cube of cheese in the middle. | used to but | don't anymore, ever since the hot cheese scorched my chin!
7. Make Ahead: Refrigerate overnight raw or freeze in airtight container. Then defrost and cook per recipe. Or cook per recipe then cool, then refrigerate up to 3 days or freeze and thaw, then reheat in a hot oven 200C/390F for 12 to 15 minutes until heated through and crunchy again.

Serving suggestion: serve with tomato sauce
51.25/25 servingsEgg Roll Recipe - How to Make Egg Rolls
Prep Time: 30 minutes Cook Time: 45 minutes  Total Time: 1 hour 15 minutes
These homemade eqg rolls are super crispy and way better than takeout. This makes a big batch of pork egg rolls which is perfect for meal planning. They freeze and reheat really well.
Author: Natasha Kravchuk
Skill Level: Easy/Medium
Cost to Make: $18-522 Keyword: egg rolls, pork egg roll Cuisine: Asian, Chinese Course: Appetizer
Calories: 130 kcal
Servings: 40 egq rolls

Ingredients
40 frozen egg roll or spring roll wrappers (8"x8"), thawed* 3 oz vermicelli rice noodles (Chinese angel hair rice sticks) 11b ground pork
8 0z mushrooms brown or white
1 medium onion finely chopped
2 medium carrots grated or cut into matchsticks
4 cups green cabbage thinly sliced
2 tsp salt or to taste, (divided)
1/2 tsp black pepper or to taste
112 Thsp soy sauce
1 tsp sesame oil
Peanut oil or Canola Qil for frying (2-3 inches of oil)
1 eqgqg (beaten) for sealing eggrolls
Instructions
1. Place noodles in a large heatproof bowl and pour steaming hot water over the noodles. Separate the noodles by pulling them apart with forks and let it rest 5-7 minutes to soften until tender. Rinse with cold water to cool them down then drain really well. Chop the rice noodles to about 1-inch pieces on a cutting board and transfer to a large mixing bowl.
2. Place a deep skillet over mediumjfhigh heat. Add 1 Thsp il and saute ground pork until cooked through and season with 1/2 tsp salt. Transfer to the mixing bow! with noodles.
3. In the same skillet, add 2 Thsp oil, sliced mushrooms, diced onions, and shredded carrots. Sautee until softened (5-6 minutes) then add 4 cups cabbage and sautee just until wilted (2 minutes). Season with 1/2 tsp salt and transfer to the mixing bowl with the noodles.
4. Season egg roll mixture with 1tsp salt, 1/2 tsp black pepper, 11/2 Tbhsp soy sauce, and 1tsp sesame oil. Since the filling is fully cooked, taste it, and add more seasoning to taste. Drain any excess liquid from the filling if present.
5. Peel back 1 egg roll wrapper and place it in a triangle shape on a clean work surface. Keep remaining egg roll wrappers covered with a damp paper towel to keep them from drying out. Add 1/4 cup of filling onto the bottom third of the wrapper.
6. Fold the bottom corner over the filling and tuck underneath. Roll tightly towards the center then fold in the sides, roll again
then brush the last flap lightly with beaten egg and roll to seal. Repeat with remaining egg rolls. Keep the formed egq rolls covered with plastic wrap so they don't dry out.
7. Heat oil in a dutch oven or fryer to 350°F. Fry 5-7 egg rolls at a time for 5-6 minutes or until golden brown and crispy. Egg rolis should sizzle when they are in the oil. Keep the temperature of the oil between 340-350°F while frying. Transfer to a wire rack and cool 15 minutes before serving with your favorite sauce.
Recipe Notes
*Thaw packaged egg roll wrappers at room temperature 45 minutes before using. We recommend frozen brands like "Spring Home" "Wei Chuan" or "Little Chef." We found them in our local Asian market store. MNutrition Disclosure: oil content is estimated at 1 tsp oil per egg roll.

Serving suggestion: serve with homemade Chinese food51.25/40 servings [ngredients: 8 0z Cream Cheege | Bint Sour Cream (6 oz) [ b Ground Beef or Turkey | package Taco Seagoning Mix [ Can Refried Beang 2 Cups of Shredded Cheege of your choice | Tomato, diced | Onion, diced
Directions:
Mix Cream Cheese and sour cream together until smooth. {This i eagier if both are at room temperature). Spread into a [3” x 9” dish/pan.
Brown meat and drain. Add taco geagoning (no water) and onione. Mix well. Spread over cheese mixture. Spread Refried Beang next. Sprinkle tomatoeg next, then the cheege on top.
Bake at 350 for (5 minutes. Serve with tortilla chipg.

Taco Dip

Serving suggestion: serve with chips
51.25/8 servingsTwice Baked Potatoes
PRED TIME 30 minutes COOK TIME |5 minutes TOTAL TIME 45 minuteg QERVINGS 2 gervingg
[ngredients 6 emall rusget potatoes % cup milk % cup gour cream % teagpoon garlic powder a cup butter [ tablegpoon gliced chives (or green oniong) 1% cups shredded cheddar cheese, divided salt and pepper to taste
[ngtructions Preheat oven to 375°F. Wagh potatoes and poke with a fork. Bake potatoes in oven | hour or microwave until goft. Allow them to cool slightly. Slice each potato in 4 lengthwige. Scoop out the pulp of the potato leaving a 6" chell. In a bowl, magh potatoes, sour cream, butter, garlic powder, salt and pepper until smooth. Add milk ag needed to create a creamy texture. Stir in chivee and 3/4 cup cheddar cheege. Fill each skin with the maghed potato filling and top with remaining cheege. Bake (5-20 minutes or until heated through and cheese is melted.

Serving suggestion: have as is
$1.25/12 servings
Bacon Cheeseburger Crescent Ring
(0]0]0
network

94 Recipe courtesy of Food Network Kitchen
Have your golden, flaky crescent rolls and eat your cheeseburger too: This crowd-pleasing ring is filled with beef and all your favorite burger toppings--bacon, cheese, pickles and a special sauce. ...
Level: Easy Total: 1 hr 15 min
(includes cooling time) Active: 35 min Yield: 8to 10 servings
Ingredients:
» 3/4 cup ketchup
3/4 cup mayonnaise
40 dill pickle chips, finely chopped, plus 16 whole dill pickle chips (from a 32-ounce jar)
1/3 cup yellow mustard
6 strips bacon, chopped
Half small red onion, finely chopped
1 pound ground beef
Kosher salt and freshly ground black pepper Nonstick cooking spray, for the pan
= Two 8-ounce tubes refrigerated crescent roll dough
5 slices American cheese, cut in half
2 tablespoons unsalted butter, melted
» 1 teaspoon toasted sesame seeds
Directions:
Special equipment: a 5-inch ramekin
1 Preheat oven to 375 degrees F. Stir
together the ketchup, mayonnaise, chopped pickles and mustard in a medium bowl. Set aside.

2 Cook the bacon in a large skillet over medium-high heat until golden and
crispy, 3 to 4 minutes per side. Drain all but 1 tablespoon of bacon drippings from the skillet. Add the onion and cook, stirring occasionally, until softened, 2 to 3 minutes. Add in the ground beef, 1/2 teaspoon salt and a few grinds of pepper and cook, breaking the meat up with a wooden spoon and scraping up any brown bits in the pan, until golden brown in spots and cooked through, 5 to 6 minutes. Transfer to a medium bowl and let cool slightly, about 15 minutes. Stir in 3/4 cup of the ketchup sauce.
Coat the back of a baking sheet with cooking spray. Unroll both cans of
crescent dough and separate unto 16 triangles. Put a 5-inch ramekin in the center of the prepared baking sheet. Arrange the triangles in a ring around the ramekin so the short sides of the dough are touching the ramekin, overlapping slightly, and the pointed ends are facing outward (it should look like a giant sun).
Spoon the beef mixture over the short ends of the triangles closest to the
ramekin. Cover the beef with the cheese slices. Top the cheese with the pickle slices. Remove the ramekin. Take hold of the pointed end of one of the triangles and fold it up and over the filling, tucking the tip under the bottom edge of dough to secure (the dough will not cover the filling completely but should cover the pickle slice). Repeat with the remaining triangles (there will be some gaps where you can see the beef mixture).
5 Bake until the dough is golden brown and the cheese is melted, about 25
minutes. Brush the ring with butter and sprinkle on the sesame seeds. Let cool for 15 minutes. Use a spatula to slide the ring off the baking sheet onto a platter. Serve with the remaining ketchup sauce.

Serving suggestion: have as is
51.25/ 8 servings

am wugpma
Guacamole o d ok W
You can make this avocado salad smooth or chunky depending on your Servings: 4
tastes.
Ingredients
3 avocados - peeled, pitted, and mashed
1lime, juiced 1 teaspoon salt Y2 cup diced onion
3 tablespoons chopped fresh cilantro
2 roma (plum) tomatoes, diced
1 teaspoon minced garlic
1 pinch ground cayenne pepper (Optional)
Prep: 10 mins Total: 10 mins

Yield: 4 servings
Directions
Step 1
In a medium bowl, mash together the avocados, lime juice, and salt. Mixin onion, cilantro, tomatoes, and garlic. Stir in cayenne pepper. Refrigerate 1 hour for best flavor, or serve immediately.
Tips Upgrade your cutting boards using our guide to the best cutting boards on the market, then use them to prepare our favarite recipes,
Nutrition Facts Per Serving: 262 calories; protein 3.7g; carbohydrates 18g; fat 22.2g; sodium 595.7mg.

Serving suggestion: serve with tacos
$2.50/4 servingsPREP 10mins TOTAL 10mins
Homemade hummus is very easy to make and it tastes much better than anything you can buy at the store. If you don’t have any tahini, a paste made from sesame seeds, you can try making it yourself (see our Easy Homemade Tahini Recipe) or leave it out.
A chickpea purée without it is still quite delicious. Just add more olive oil. Another option is to use a natural unsweetened creamy peanut butter in its place. We love serving this with flatbread — here’s our easy flatbread recipe from scratch.

Makes 6 servings or about 1 1/2 cups
YOU WILL NEED 1 (15-ounce) can chickpeas or 1 1/2 cups (250 grams) cooked chickpeas 1/4 cup (60 ml) fresh lemon juice (1 large lemon) 1/4 cup (60 ml) well-stirred tahini, see our homemade tahini recipe 1 small garlic clove, minced 2 tablespoons (30 ml) extra-virgin olive oil, plus more for serving 1/2 teaspoon ground cumin Salt to taste 2 to 3 tablespoons (30 to 45 ml) water Dash ground paprika or sumac, for serving

DIRECTIONS
In the bowl of a food processor, combine the tahini and lemon juice and process for 1 minute, scrape the sides and bottom of the bow! then process for 30 seconds more. This extra time helps “whip” or “cream” the tahini, making the hummus smooth and creamy.

Add the olive oil, minced garlic, cumin, and a 1/2 teaspaon of salt to the whipped tahini and lemon juice. Process for 30 seconds, scrape the sides and bottom of the bowl then process another 30 seconds or until well blended. Open, drain, and rinse the chickpeas. Add half of the chickpeas to the food processor and process for 1 minute. Scrape sides and bottom of the bowl, then add remaining chickpeas and process until thick and quite smooth; 1 to 2 minutes.
N T

Taste for salt and adjust as needed. Serve hummus with a drizzle of olive oil and dash of paprika. Store homemade hummus in an airtight container and refrigerate up to one week.
ADAM AND JOANNE'S TIPS
e How to Cook Chickpeas: You can use canned or home-cooked chickpeas for this recipe. To see how we cook dried chickpeas, see our simple tutorial here. We have included three met how to do it in a slow cooker.
* If you love a strong garlic flavor in hummus, you might want to increase the garlic by a clove or you can add roasted garlic — here’s how we roast garlic.
e Nutrition facts: The nutrition facts provided below are estimates. We have used the USDA Supertracker recipe calculator to calculate approximate values.
If you make this recipe, snap a photo and hashtag it #inspiredtaste — We love to see your creations on Instagram and Facebook! Find us: @inspiredtaste Serving suggestion: serve with veggies
$2.50/6 servingsIngredients
Poutine Gravy: e 3 Tbsp cornstarch e 2 Tbsp water e 6 Thsp unsalted butter e 1/4 cup unbleached all purpose flour 20 oz beef broth 10 oz chicken broth Pepper, to taste
For Deep Fried Fries: e 2 |bs Russet potatoes (3-4 medium potatoes) e Peanut or other frying oil
Toppings: e 1-11/2 cups white cheddar cheese curds (Or torn chunks of mozzarella cheese would be the closest substitution)

Instructions
1 2
Prepare the gravy: In a small bowl, dissolve the cornstarch in the water and set aside.
In a large saucepan, melt the butter. Add the flour and cook, stirring regularly, for about 5 minutes, until the mixture turns golden brown.
. Add the beef and chicken broth and bring to a boil, stirring with a whisk. Stir in about HALF the
cornstarch mixture and simmer for a minute or so. If you'd like your gravy thicker, add a more of the cornstarch mixture, in small increments, as needed, to thicken. Season with pepper. Taste and add additional salt, if necessary, to taste. Make ahead and re-warm or keep warm until your fries are ready.
For Deep-Fried Fries: Prepare your potatoes and cut into 1/2-inch thick sticks. Place into a large bowl and cover completely with cold water. Allow to stand at least one hour or several hours. When ready to cook, heat your oil in your deep fryer or large, wide, heavy cooking pot to 300° F.
Remove the potatoes from the water and place onto a sheet of paper towel. Blot to remove as much excess moisture as possible.
Add your fries to the 300°F oil and cook for 5-8 minutes, just until potatoes are starting to cook but are not yet browned. Remove potatoes from oil and scatter on a wire rack. Increase oil temperature to 375°F Once oil is heated to that temperature, return the potatoes to the fryer and cook until potatoes are golden brown. Remove to a paper towel-lined bowl.
. To Prepare Poutine: Add your fried or baked fries to a large, clean bowl. Season lightly with salt
while still warm. Add a ladle of hot poutine gravy to the bowl and using tongs, toss the fries in the gravy. Add more gravy, as needed to mostly coat the fries.
. Add the cheese curds and toss with the hot fries and gravy. Serve with freshly ground pepper.
Serve immediately. o

Serving suggestion: have as is
$3.00/3 servingsMorton’s Crab Cakes
QERVINGS 6 servings
[ngredients | pound fresh lump crabmeat (about 3 cupe loogely packed)
[ Cup bread crumbs (Note 1)
[ large egg
8 Tablespoone Mustard-Mayonnaice Sauce (Note 2) | Tablegpoon chopped frech curly-leaf parcley
[ Teagpoon Dijon Mustard
/2. Teagpoon Worcegtershire Sauce
[/4 Teagpoon Tabagco cauce
6 Tablespoong Olive Oil (or clarified butter, melted)
[nstructions [ Dreheat oven to 450°F. 2. Drain the crabmeat and put in a medium bowl. Pick through the erabmeat to remove
any bite of ehell, if necessary. Add the bread erumbe and gently togg until combined. 3. [n a emall bowl, whisk together the eqg, 2 tablegpoon of Mustard-Mayonnaise sauce,
the parsley, mustard and Worcestershire and Tabageo gauceg. Pour thie mixture over
the crabmeat. Using a rubber gpatula, gently fold the egg mixture into the crabmeat.
. Divide the crabmeat into gix equal portione, each meaguring /2. cup. Gently form each portion of crabmeat into ball a ball and flatten into a -ineh thick cake.
. But the oil (or butter)in a 7” x II” ovenproof dich and then put the crab cakes in the pan. Bake for 7-8 minuteg, or until golden brown on the bottom. Gently turn the crab cakeg and bake for 7-& minuteg longer, or until the eakeg are golden brown on both cides and cooked through. Serve with the remaining © tablespoone of MustardMayonnaige Sauce on the gide.
Note l: Bread Crumbe (If you want to make your own bread crumbe)
- 8 oz firm white bread
- 5 teagpoone minced garlic
- 2 teagpoong minced shallot
- 2 teagpoone chopped frech curly-leaf pargley - Qalt and freghly ground pepper

| Qlice the cruste from the bread and then cut the bread into large chunke. Discard the crusts or regerve them for another uge.
2. In the bowl of a food processor fitted with a metal blade, grind the bread to fine crumbg. Trangfer the erumbe to a mixing bowl.
Dat the garlic and shallot dry with a paper towel. Add to the bread crumbe and toge to
mix. Add the parcley, toee and eeagon o taste with ealt & pepper. Mix well. Use right
away or store the bread crumbs in tightly covered container for up to 2 hours.
Note 2: Mustad-Mayonnaise Sauce - [1/2 eupe mayonnaige
- 3 Tablegpoong Dijon mustard
- 3/4 teagpoon Worcestershire sauce
- |-/ teagpoong prepared horgeradich

. [n mixing bowl, stir together add ingredients . Whisk with a wire whigk until lightened and smooth. 2. Uge immediately or transfer to a lidded container and refrigerate for up to 5 dayge.

Serving suggestion: have as is
$25.00/6 servings

D Recipe Image servings
Easy Waffle Fries Recipe (Chick-Fil-A Copycat)
The best homemade Chick-Fil-A copycat waffle fries made from scratch. You'll only need 3 simple ingredients!
PR N 5 from 2 votes PREP TIME 25 mins ] = COURSE CUISINE Snacks American
INGREDIENTS
¢ 5 Russet potatoes ¢ 5-6 cups Canola oail for frying e Sea salt to taste
INSTRUCTIONS
B oW N =
4 minutes in small batches.
@ COOK TIME TOTAL TIME 6 mins 31 mins R SERVINGS CALORIES 4 servings 3028 kcal
Slice the potatoes into waffle shapes using a Mandoline.
Place the potato slices in a large bowl of cold water. Allow them to soak in the water for at least 20 minutes.
In a large pot or deep fryer, heat your oil to 320 degrees F.
Drain out the cold water then thoroughly dry your sliced potatoes before placing them inside the deep fryer. Fry them for 3-
. After 4-5 minutes, remove them from the oil and allow them to cool on paper towels.
. Increase your oil temperature to 375 degrees F.
. Return the potatoes to the oil and allow them to cook for an additional 2-3 minutes or until they are golden and crispy.
. Sprinkle with sea salt or preferred waffle seasoning.
10. Serve and enjoy while hot!
NUTRITION
Serving: 49 Calories: 3028kcal
Serving suggestion: serve with burgers
51.25/4 servings
Carbohydrates: 40.2g
5
6
7
8. Remove from the oil and transfer to towel-lined baking sheets. 9
0
Protein: 5.2g Fiber: 5.69

)is|

Ingredients for 3 servings
3 russet potatoes 2 tablespoons olive oil 2 teaspoons salt
1 cup shredded cheddar cheese, plus more for
topping Y2 cup scallions, chopped
% cup bacon, chopped, divided
Y2 cup sour cream, plus more for topping
1tablespoon butter Ya cup milk 1teaspoon pepper
chive, to serve

Nutrition Info .., ;e +
Powered by Walmart

Serve warm with sour cream and chives.

Serving suggestion: have as is or have it with a meal
$1.25/3 servings

Preparation 1 Preheat the oven to 350°F (180°C).
2 Carefully pierce potatoes with a fork. On a baking sheet oil the potatoes well and sprinkle with salt.

Bake for one hour. If making more potatoes, an additional 15 minutes per potato is needed.

Once cooled, cut the potatoes vertically, scoop out the inside, and transfer to a bowl.
In the bowl with the scooped out potato, add the cheese, scallions, ¥2 cup (110 g) of bacon, sour cream, butter, milk, and pepper, and mix well.
Scoop the potato mixture back into the hollowed-out potatoes and top with cheddar cheese and remaining 'a cup (55 G) of bacon bits.
Bake an additional 15 minutes until the cheese is melted.
Broceoli Casgerole
[ngredients: 32 oz Frozen Chopped Broecoli 2 Sleeves of Ritz Crackers [ etick of butter 8 oz Velvetta or Cheege of your choice
Directions: Cook broceoli according to packages. Melt butter. Crush crackers and add to
melted butter. Mix well. Dice cheege (or uge shredded). Drain broceoli, mix with cheese and 3/4 of the cracker crumbe. Pour into 2 quart cascerole digh. Top with remaining cracker erumbg. Bake at 350 for 30 minutes

Serving suggestion: have as is
51.25/8 servings

FOOD&WINE
Crispy Onion Rings
¥ %
Crispy Onion Rings Total: 30 mins Yield: 10
"There's nothing better than a simple tempura of a primo vegetable," states Peter Hoffman. For this sensational version, he
coats thick onion rings in an ultralight batter and quickly fries
© Zubin Schroff
them. Hoffman says that any vegetable that slices nicely, like delicata squash, fennel or zucchini, would be great here, as long as it "takes to the batter"—meaning the batter stays on.More Fast
Snacks from Star Chefs
Ingredients
1 quart vegetable oil, for frying
2 large Spanish onions, cut crosswise into 1/2-inch rings
2 teaspoons kosher salt, plus more for sprinkling
3 to 4 cups club soda, chilled
1 teaspoon baking powder
3 cups all-purpose flour
1/3 cup cornstarch
Directions
Stepln a large bowl, whisk the flour with the cornstarch, baking powder and the 2
1 teaspoons of kosher salt. Whisk in 3 cups of the club soda until the batter is smooth. Add more club soda, about 1 tablespoon at a time, until the mixture is the consistency of thin pancake batter. Let stand for 10 minutes.
StepMeanwhile, in a large saucepan, heat the vegetable oil to 380°. Dip 8 onion
2 ringsin the batter, letting the excess drip back into the bowl. Fry the onion rings in the hot oil over high heat, turning occasionally, until golden and crispy, about 3 minutes. Transfer the onion rings to a paper towel-lined baking sheet and sprinkle lightly with salt. Repeat with the remaining onion rings and batter and serve hot or warm.

© Copyright 2021 foodandwine.com. All rights reserved. Printed from https://www.foodandwine.com 04/30/2021

Service suggestion: serve with a burger
$1.50/2-3Ingredients for 15 tots
12 oz broccoli, cut into small florets
Ya cup scallions, thinly sliced
2 cloves large garlic, finely diced
% cup shredded cheddar cheese
1egg, beaten
% cup bread crumbs salt, to taste
pepper, to taste
2 teaspoons Sriracha, optional but recommended

Nutrition Info ,_, ;s +
Powered by Walmart

Enjoy!

Serving suggestion: server with a burger
$1.50/3 servings

Desserts

Preparation
1 Fill a medium saucepan with water and bring to a boil. Aggressively season with salt. Blanch the broccoli in boiling water for about two minutes.

Drain and finely chop the cooked broccoli.

In a mixing bowl, add broccoli, scallions, garlic, cheddar, egg, and bread crumbs. Optional: Add hot sauce of choice. Mix well and chill in the refrigerator for 15-20
minutes.

Preneat oven to 400°F (204°C).
Spray a nonstick baking sheet with nonstick spray. Shape the mixture into tot shapes and spread them evenly on the sheet.
Bake for 8-9 minutes. Flip and then bake for an additional 8—9 minutes on the other side until golden brown.


Chip Cookies
Salted Caramel Chocolate 00C
network
Recipe courtesy of Valerie Bertinelli
Level: Intermediate
Total: 55 min (includes cooling time) Active: 30 min Yield: about 36 cookies
° . .
.
.
-
s
. :
0 .
. .
STAPLE

4 Ingredients:
3 cups all-purpose flour
1 teaspoon baking powder
1/2 teaspoon baking soda
1/4 teaspoon fine salt
1 cup packed light brown sugar
1/2 cup granulated sugar
2 sticks butter, softened
2 large eggs
1 1/2 teaspoons pure vanilla extract 3/4 cups semisweet chocolate chips 1 cup caramel bits or caramel candies, chopped
1 1/2 teaspoons flaky sea salt
Show: Valerie's Home Cooking Episode: Big Game, Big Flavors!
Directions:
1 Preheatthe oven to 375 degrees F;
position racks in the upper and lower thirds of the oven. Line two baking sheets with parchment paper.

2 Whisk the flour, baking powder, baking soda and fine salt together in a bowl.
3 With an electric mixer, beat the brown sugar, granulated sugar and butter together in a large bowl until light and fiuffy, 3 minutes. Add the eggs, one ata
time, beating well after each addition. Add the vanilla extract and beat to combine.
Add the flour mixture and beat until just incorporated. Stir in the chocolate chips
and caramel bits.
Scoop heaping tablespoons of the dough onto the baking sheets, leaving about 2 inches of space between the cookies (you will have cookie dough left over). Sprinkle each cookie with a pinch of sea salt.
Bake the cookies until golden brown, rotating the position of the baking sheets halfway through, 13 minutes. Transfer the cookies to a rack to cool. Meanwhile, cool the baking sheets and repeat with the remaining cookie dough.
Related Pages
Thin and Crispy Chocolate Chip Crispy Chocolate-Mint Cookies Mocha Chocolate Chip Cookies
Cookies Recipe
White Bean Chocolate Chip
Cookies Recipe
Recipe Recipe Sun-Butter Chocolate Chip Extra Crispy Chocolate Chip Cookies Recipe Cookies Recipe

Serving suggestion: server as is
5.25/36 servingsKitchen Sink Cookies (Panera Copycat)
Filled with chocolate, caramel, and crushed pretzels, these Kitchen Sink Cookies are a Panera Bread copycat and the perfect blend of salty and sweet. One of these jumbo cookies is plenty to share, but you probably won't want to!

3
Ak sk

® Course Dessert S ! 4,67 from 9 votes ® Cuisine American % Keyword everything but the kitchen sink cookies, kitchen sink cookies, panera copycat & Prep Time 15 minutes - Cook Time 9 minutes a Total Time 24 minutes ¥{ servings 12 cookies EX Calories 481keal g Author Melissa Williams Ingredients
%4 cup butter cubed
1% cups light brown sugar
1large egg
1 large egg yolk
1 Tablespoon vanilla extract
2 % cups all purpose flour
1 teaspoon baking soda
Y2 teaspoon salt
6 oz dark chocolate chopped (about 1 cup) Y2 cup Werther's original caramels chopped into small pieces % cup crushed pretzels
sea salt
Instructions
1.
Preheat the oven to 350° and line two baking sheets with silicone mats or parchment paper. Set aside.
. In a medium microwave safe bowl, add the cubed butter and brown sugar. Microwave for
30 seconds, stir, then repeat until fully combined. Let sit for approximately 5 minutes to cool.
While cooling, in a large bowl, whisk together the flour, baking soda, and salt.
. Once the butter mixture has slightly cooled, stir in the egg, egg yolk, and vanilla. . Pour the wet mixture into the dry ingredients and stir to fully combine.
. Pour in the chopped chocolate, chopped caramels, and crushed pretzels ad stir to evenly
distribute.
. To make jumbo cookies, scoop 3 Tablespoons of dough, roll into a ball, place on the
prepared baking sheet and sprinkle with sea salt - 4 cookies per baking sheet. Bake for 9 minutes or until edges are browned and centers are set. Remove from oven and let fully cool on the pan.
. To make regular sized cookies, use a medium (1.5 Tb) cookie scoop, roll into a ball, place
on the prepared baking sheet and sprinkle with sea salt - 12 cookies per baking sheet. Bake for 8 minutes or until edges are browned and centers are set. Remove from oven and let fully cool on the pan.
Notes | use a Trader Joe's 72% Pound chocolate bar to chop up. Chocolate chips can also be used.Serving suggestion: have as is $1.20/12 servings
Easy Lemon Drop Cookies
These Easy Lemon Drop Cookies are made in one bowl, a simple buttery lemony cookie that will satisfy every lemon lover.
Prep Time Cook Time Total Time 10 mins 15 mins 25 mins

Course: cookies, Dessert Cuisine: American Servings: 20 cookies  Calories: 113kcal  Author: Rosemary Molloy
5 from 9 votes
Ingredients e 2 cups all purpose flour (260 grams) e 1/2 cup +11/2 tablespoons granulated sugar (120 grams) 1 teaspoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon baking soda 1 pinch salt* zest of 1lemon 2 large eggs (room temperature) 1/2 cup butter (soft)* (105 grams) 1 tablespoon fresh lemon juice 1/4-1/3 cup shredded or flaked unsweetened (desiccated) coconut (I used 1/4 cup) (2533 grams)
*If using unsalted butter then use 1/4 teaspoon of salt.
Instructions 1. Pre-heat oven to 350F (180C). Line two cookie sheets with parchment paper.
2. In the mixing bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, baking soda, salt and zest.
3. Add the eggs, butter and lemon juice, beat to combine (do not over beat). Fold in the shredded coconut (or any extra such as nuts, raisins or chocolate chips) if using.
4. Drop by spoonfuls and sprinkle with more coconut or pearl sugar if desired. Bake for approximately 15-18 minutes or until golden (lightly browned around the edges) let cool on cookie sheet then move to a wire rack. Dust with powdered sugar before serving if
desired. Enjoy!

Serving suggestion: have as is
$1.50/20 servings


SUNDAY DINNER


| Amarelﬁ
Almond Macaroons
—_ N\
s TRl e s s e e -
Makes 36
One 8~ounce can glmond paste
1 cup sugar
2 large egg whites, at room temperature
36 red or green candied cherries or whole almonds
a8
Preheat the oven to 350°E. Line two large baking sheets with parchment paper or foil.
In a food processor or the large bowl of an electric mixer, combine the almond paste and sugar. Process or beat until blended. Add the egg whites and process or beat until very smooth.
Scoop up 1 tablespoon of the batter and lightly roll itinto a ball. Dampen your fingertips with cool water if necessary to prevent sticking. Place on a prepared baking sheet and repeat with the remaining batter, placing the balls about 1 inch apart on the baking sheets. Push a candied cherry or almond into the top of each cookie.
Bake for 18 to 20 minutes, or until the cookies are lightly browned. Let cool briefly on the baking sheets. With a thin metal spatula, transfer the cookies to wire racks to cool completely.
Store the cookies in airtight containers.



Serving suggestion: have as is

$2.50/8-10 servings

Modified kitchen tools

ChoppingEtac Swedish One-Handed Food Preparation Cutting Board is ideal for persons who have had a stroke or have neurological impairments that limit them to the use of one hand. This robust, multi-purpose food preparation aid enables the user to hold food in place for cutting, peeling or grating

Rocker knife

7

Strawberry cutter360 Circular Rolling Knife

Extra help

J
Peddle Master Vehicle Hand ControlsSmart Measuring Cup

One touch can opener

paImPeelerm e
vegetable peeler

BUILT-IN STAINLESS STEEL LOOP EYER


Chetf'n PalmPeeler Vegetable Peeler, Palm, Wasabi

ERGONOMIC DESIGN FOR A MORE COMFORTAEBLE FIT

Cutting board
Gripper Bamboo Cutting BoardCier Bipdy


Chef Buddy Sink Cutting Board

Napoleon Cutting Board with Stainless Steel Bowls

Electronic applianceThe Lynx Smart Grill is a voice activated gas grill that cooks based on voice commands. It also lets you monitor cooking from a smart device and will send automatic notifications | Select to Start
English Muffin
e
@ oo
JTION


Electric toaster
GE’s Brillion app lets you control your oven remotely: preheat while you’re picking vegetables in the backyard or change the oven’s temperature while you finish watching a movie.

Dinner Datrost (AR st [ 0 e A LT
Fower 30Sec  Time
]
LR
Timer s
L Connect

With a GE Microwave powered by SmartHQ Wifi technology, you can monitor your timers from anywhere, scan-to-cook your favorite microwave meals and use your voice with Amazon Alexa or Google

Assistant.

GE Profile Refrigerators powered by SmartHQ, you can use your refrigerator in a whole new way!

Alerts
The refrigerator's temperature is too high
The water filter needs to be replaced
The refrigerator door is left open
Controls
Schedule hot water for your morning cup of coffee* Initiating water heating from your phone*
Turn the icemaker on and off
Adjust the temperature
Control Sabbath Mode, Turbo Cool and Turbo Freeze
